Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
Number of Reviews
31

Author
Kevin Patterson
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY
Rating: **1/2 (out of four)
R, 1998
Directors: Peter & Bobby Farrelly
Screenplay: Ed Decter, John J. Straus, Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly
Starring Cast: Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller
I didn't expect this to happen, but I finally saw THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY and I really don't have too much to say about it. I figured that
either I would be extremely grossed out and offended, or I would find it
hysterically funny, or both. Instead, I found myself feeling strangely
indifferent to the whole thing. Yes, it's gross, and yes, it's funny, but
it's nothing to write home about on either count.
This may be partly a result of the fact that others had told me about the
most, uh, unusual jokes before I saw the movie, and therefore the shock
factor was diluted. The movie is, in fact, a lot more explicit with vulgar
sight gags than most comedies. But since I had been told, for example, that
Ben Stiller would have a slight...mishap, shall we say, when zipping up his
pants, I pretty much knew what was going to happen as soon as he walked
into the bathroom. The same goes for another disgusting scene in which
Cameron Diaz's character rubs some gel in her hair that, well, isn't
actually gel: I knew the joke was coming a good three minutes ahead of time.
A lot of the jokes are equally tasteless. Some of them, particularly those
involving a dog on speed, are pretty funny, some of them start to make the
audience uncomfortable with such questionable tactics as making fun of the
mentally and physically handicapped (though this wasn't played nearly as
offensively as I was afraid it might be), and some, such as a guy who walks
around with a grotesque skin condition the whole time, are just dumb and
pointless. By and large, the funniest jokes are the ones that just aim for
plain weirdness without worrying about being gross, such as when a
hitchhiker explains that he plans to make money by producing a seven minute
abs training video (thereby cutting into the "Eight-Minute Abs" video
market).
Surprisingly enough, one of the strengths of THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY is that the story, in which Ted (Ben Stiller) tries to ingratiate
himself to Mary (Cameron Diaz), for whom he has carried a torch for
thirteen years, is handled reasonably well and actually has us rooting for
Ted and Mary by the end. Among the obstacles are four other men, (including
a P.I. Ted had originally hired to find her, since they'd lost touch after
high school), and all of whom go to ridiculous lengths of deception to
impress Mary. It's fairly easy to understand why, as Mary spends much of
her time caring for her handicapped brother and generally seems to be most
good-natured person on the face of the planet. There's a fairly complex web
of lies and fake identities involved in all this, and I was pleasantly
surprised at how well the Farrellys kept it all together and the clever,
composed manner in which it all becomes clear.
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY has been hyped largely as a gross-out comedy
in the tradition of John Waters, but to me it seemed more like a romantic
comedy, only with gags that are much more low-brow and bizarre than what
you'd normally see. As such, it's reasonably entertaining, but it's not the
love-it-or-hate-it spectacle that I had expected, and in the end it's
actually one of my more forgettable cinematic experiences of the year.
Send comments to ktpattersn@aol.com.
Visit my Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Steve Kong
I don't remember the last time I laughed this hard at a movie. There's
Something About Mary is one of the funniest movies I've seen lately.
The story is simple. There's a girl named Mary, who everyone thinks is a
fox. Guys will do anything to get Mary - everyone except for Ted, a
genuinely nice guy who had a mishap with Mary while in high school. Now,
thirteen years later, Ted wants to find Mary and maybe get back together
with her.
Mary is about the only character in There's Something About Mary that is
sane. Played by the beautiful Cameron Diaz, Mary is the object of lust for
all the on-screen men. Diaz does a good job with her part, projecting a
naive, appealing warmth. Opposite Mary is Ted, played by Ben Stiller. Ted's
life is an absolute mess - everything that could go wrong for Ted does go
wrong. Stiller is hilarious as Ted.
The script by Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly & Bobby
Farrelly definitely deserves its R rating; the gross sexual humor makes
this movie unfit for kids.
Direction from the Farrelly brothers is good, though at points they seem to
lose focus and drift. The movie does have its slow moments - moments in
which I found myself looking at my watch wondering either when the movie
would end or when the next laugh-out-loud-sequence was going to appear.
Speaking of laugh-out-loud-sequences, an early scene is hilarious. The
scene consists of Ted, a bathroom, and a stubborn zipper. The Farrelly
brothers leave nothing to the imagination with this scene. A lot of what
happens in the opening is shown in trailers, but there are some sight gags
that are not (and couldn't be) shown during trailers. There are other
moments, like the one with a dog on speed and a hair gel incident that left
the audience howling. Small moments with a singing duel are silly. And
there's a scene with fake nudity that will shock you.
There's Something About Mary is a film that will not suit everyone. There
will be those who think that this crude humor really doesn't belong in
theatres. But, if you're willing to let go of some of your respectability
when you walk into the theatre, you'll love There's Something About Mary.
The guy who sat next to me during the screening kept screaming, "Oh, that's
just not right!" Right or not, it was funny. Don't Miss There's Something
About Mary.
On a side note, I think that the advertising for There's Something About
Mary was skewed a bit, which resulted in my seeing the film this late.
"Warning The guys who did 'Dumb & Dumber' and 'Kingpin' bring you a love
story." That is what the ads said and I took heed of the warning because I
didn't like Dumb & Dumber at all. And I'm sure there are many who didn't
either. For the record, There's Something Like Mary is a lot more enjoyable
than Dumb & Dumber. I regret seeing the film so late.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
   As the crowd was leaving an advance screening of "There's
Something About Mary," a guy in the lobby was passing out
bottles of hair gel with the name of the film on the logo.  The
stuff was free, so why not?  Everyone grabbed, a few
laughed, some tucked the bottles into their handbags and
jacket pockets.  But a few groaned aaaargh and tossed the
stuff into the trash without smelling or trying the substance. 
Why the overreaction?  The "hair gel" is the movie's biggest
joke, or, more accurately, the grossest sally.  It's the gag that
everyone will be talking about.  If this movie were up for an
Oscar (which is doubtful), this is the sort of thing that the
Academy would remember at voting time even if the film had
opened thirteen months before the poll.  When Mary
(Cameron Diaz) accepts a dab of the gel from Ted (Ben
Stiller), who is madly in love with her, and places it on the
front of her sunshine-bright blond hair, the audience roars. 
Why?  You'll have to see the movie, though it's likely as not
that your pals already spilled the beans (so to speak).
   They always tell us in film school about the critic who roars
with laughter, and while he's doubling up with mirth he's
moaning, "This is awful, oh this is terrible, ah this picture is
the pits."  This is the kind of reaction this movie gives.  The
script has a few corkers and cases of multiple mistaken
identities that you probably won't figure out. For the most part,
though, its humor depends on the same sorts of gross-outs
that the Farrelly brothers were noted for in their previous
exercise in coarseness, "Dumb and Dumber."  "Dumb and
Dumber" has a plot that's similar to this one, also prominently
featuring a dog (Jeff Daniels ran a dog-grooming service) and
a bottle of beer which turns out to be not a bottle of beer. 
Like this, it involves a run-in with a gangster and a
rendezvous with a cop.  In fact Roger Ebert, who gave "Dumb
and Dumber" only two stars, admitted that "there is a moment
that made me laugh so loudly I embarrassed myself...I just
couldn't stop."  There's more than one twinkling just like this in
"There's Something About Mary," particularly involving a dog
which in one case reacts strongly to a tranquilizer and in
another, to speed.
   The sitcom plot revolves around an obsessive love that Ted
has felt toward Mary for thirteen years.  A student in a Rhode
Island high school, he asks her to the prom, is amazed that
she accepts, but then circumstances intervene which force
him to cancel the date.  Years later, he hears that she has
moved to Miami and hires a would-be private investigator,
Healy (Matt Dillon) to track her down.  When Healy finds her,
he also falls instantly in love and is determined to hide her
existence from his client while he courts her for himself.  The
film follows the usual strategy of romantic comedy, which is to
put obstacles in the paths of the lovers until the very end,
when the relationship is consummated or at least confirmed.
   There are two hilarious dog scenes.  In one instance,
Healy, using spy equipment, overhears Mary's neighbor
Magda (Lin Shaye) insist that Mary accept as a boy friend
only a guy who gets a friendly reaction for her Border terrier.
This little dog has growled at every stranger who enters the
house.  To insure a cordial reception, Healy tosses a
tranquilizer through the window, the dog eats, then passes out
requiring Healy to administer artifical respiration, followed by
electric shock stimulation.  In a reverse situation, the dog has
swallowed an upper and in one of the most riotous battles
ever filmed between man and terrier, Ted is vociferously
attacked, his reputation saved only when he ducks and the
dog flies through the window.  The most controversial scene
finds Ted taking a certain action before a date with Mary, one
which is designed to calm him down and which forms the
basis of the hair gel joke.  Yet another gross-out takes place
when Ted gets a part of his body caught in the zipper of his
pants just as he is to escort Mary to the prom and requires
the help of Mary's mother, her stepfather, a fireman, a cop,
and a team of paramedics.
   Political correctness takes a vacation as the Farrelly
brothers lampoon retarded adults and a cripple alike, while
spoofing psychiatrists, gays, and obese women.  
  Like "Dumb and Dumber," the plot is pitched at the level of
base, lewd and obscene films like "Mall Rats" and
"Trainspotting," and should appeal mightily to high-school
kids.  That's not to say that adults will sit through the film with
a straight face.  This is the sort of picture that you can't help
laughing with while realizing all the while that it's appealing to
your basest stretches.  In other words, you'll react just like the
critics.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Directors:  Peter & Bob Farrelly
Cast:  Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Chris Elliott, Lee Evans,
W. Earl Brown, Harland Williams
Screenplay:  Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Peter & Bob Farrelly
Producers:  Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas, Charles B.
Wessler
Runtime:  117 min.
US Distribution:  20th Century Fox
Rated R:  strong comic sexual content, language
By Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
Up front, I will humbly admit that I laughed with frequent intensity
throughout most of There's Something About Mary.  Unfortunately (perhaps
only for myself), that is not enough to make me like a movie.  This
particular picture, written and directed by Peter and Bob Farrelly, is a
pointless and insipid romantic comedy at the core, and is set apart from
the crowd of insipid romantic comedies only because of its ridiculously
cheap humor.  It has no story, weak characters, and, like all romantic
comedies, it expects us to care. 
See, I don't mind laughter.  I engage in it every once in a while, but
I like to feel something when a film is over.  I felt so indifferent, so
unmoved at the end of There's Something About Mary, that I can't give it
a positive review.  I laughed equally hard during The Opposite of Sex,
but that film is smart and subtle, in addition to being funny.  The
Farrellys -- whose credits include the boring Dumb and Dumber and the
unwatchable Kingpin -- have a talent for making us laugh at disgusting
and painful images.  But it's just not that interesting, and not the
least bit satisfying.
Ben Stiller, although he is third-billed, is the main character, Ted. 
The film opens thirteen years in the past, when Ted is in high school. 
Inexplicably, he gets invited to the prom by the luminous Mary (Cameron
Diaz); when he goes to pick her up on prom night, a few awful things
happen -- Mary's mentally handicapped brother (W. Earl Brown) attacks
him, he gets in a fight with Mary's stepfather (Keith David), and he
gets his genitals stuck in his zipper.
Flash ahead thirteen years; Ted's still thinking about Mary, so he has
private investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) find her in Miami. 
Naturally, Healy falls for Mary, and Ted is left in the dust.  The film
progresses from there, as Ted discovers numerous individuals who have
all been hopelessly swept away by Mary, and who are all now stalking her
and attempting valiantly to win her affections.  
All right, so if you're less critical than I, and you simply want to
laugh, then don't let these words stop you.  I'd be doing a horrible
disservice to the Farrellys if I didn't remind myself continually that
There's Something About Mary is a uniquely funny film -- the laughs are
more-or-less constant (aside from a few unbearable lulls), and you're
likely to find yourself guffawing so loudly that you won't be able to
hear the people around you doing the same thing.  Typically, it's good
form to give examples of points made in a review, but much of the humor
here is intended to be shocking, and, therefore, I shouldn't tell you
about it.
I can, however, mention all of the groaners, from the "touching" scenes
all the way up to the point at which the Farrellys make it clear that,
dear God, there's a story buried somewhere in this mess.  Movies like
this shouldn't even bother with stories and characters; it's a pointless
endeavor, condescending and cloying.  You wouldn't even have to see the
preview to predict the outcome of this film -- all you'd need is a
five-word synopsis of the story, and then you'd know.  I realize
consciously that no one was trying to surprise me with the turn of
events in this film, but, for once, I'd like to see a film like this
that actually manages to capture my interest without the use of
fishhooks or semen.
In the acting arena, Ben Stiller is amusing, but not given the kind of
sarcastic and cynical material that makes him funniest.  But he makes a
good hero, and I like that he's constantly unaware of everything.  Matt
Dillon, however, shows superb comic timing -- watch closely the scene in
which he's first telling Mary about his job, helping mentally deficient
people.  Diaz, in all of her shining beauty, still manages to express a
hint of intelligence and warmth, and is therefore a pleasure to watch. 
Lee Evans and Chris Elliott are both fun in unpredictable supporting
roles.
Now that they're on their third movie, I'm reasonably certain that the
Farrellys don't know the first thing about cohesive storytelling or
narration.  As directors, they're not terrible, but they don't strike me
as gifted.  As writers, they should stick to the jokes and sight-gags,
because the "serious" material here is enough to keep my eyes
permanently facing the back of my head.  So, shall I leave you admitting
that There's Something About Mary is pretty darn funny, or should I
emphasize that it lacks even the most pathetic attempts at depth and
intelligence?  Well, perhaps I'll do a little of both:  There's
Something About Mary is the funniest unsatisfying film of the year.

Author
J.K. Salisbury
Picture this.  Whenever we are about to get into a pool, of which, the
temperature may be questionable, what do we do.  Well, most of us, will stick
one foot in, to test, then the other foot a little further, then we either
ease in slowly, or just jump right in, subjecting our body to a great shock,
but with knowledge that we'll either a) Adapt, or b) Go running for the shore
cursing. Remember this analogy, I'll come back to it
I was never a fan of the Farrelly brothers movies, albeit only two, I just
didn't find their brand of humor fulfilling.  Each movie had scenes which made
me laugh, their first, Dumb and Dumber had one or two (The town is that way)
and Kingpin, their second, had a few more (We don't have a cow, we have a
bull), was it growing on me, not sure really, was curious as to their next
effort, to see how the progression went.
There's Something About Mary is that third installment, and the film works for
me.  I laughed, quite hard at times.  This was, in my eyes, a successful
progression for the brothers.  In Dumb and Dumber, they tested the water, some
laughed, some were disgusted (vote me in category two) In Kingpin, they put
their foot in a bit more, being a little more daring, a little smarter, but
still missing something, maybe a cohesive plot to hold it together. Now, with
this movie, they have taken the plunge straight into the water, and
successfully stay afloat.  Nothing is taboo here, ethnic groups, bodily
functions, voyeurism, handicapped, noone is spared here, most of the jokes
work, some don't, but those that don't in no way detract from the movie.
The opening scene is funnier than the previews which sort of spoil it a bit
(Note to other studios, Fox got this one right, it was a promotional genius
move, they teased, but never revealed, they showed some humor, but never
tipped their hand, they piqued your interest just enough to get you in the
theater, and then they unleashed, see..it can be done), but it still has to
be seen, then the movie lags, as it sets up the premise of the movie, but by
the final third, the movie is in full gear, and I was laughing, almost
rolling, at times, I had fun here, that's all I ask of a movie sometimes.
This is not a perfect movie, but then, the characters in it aren't perfect, so
it fits.  Each has their own issues, and they are dealt with in the smile, and
laugh at life, but still take things seriously, attitude.  These are real
people, that exist just on the other side of that line of reality that we all
sometimes walk.  These are characters that we are afraid to admit exist, but
make up the ecletic melting pot which is America.
Another sign that I use for good movies, is my after movie reaction,  are you
smiling, crying, showing some emotion, talking about it in general..or is it
the cinematic equivalent of Chinese food, and an hour later, you forget what
you saw.  Basically, did it leave an impression, or not.  Well, the length of
time it takes me from leaving the theater, to writing the review, is usually
a good reverse gauge, the faster I get it posted, the more of an impression
it left on me (because I want to get the thoughts down while they are
fresh)..I am less than 2 hours out of theater seeing this one, and I am still
smiling.  I had fun, I was bouncing, floating, laughing again remembering
scenes. (Another note, to Mr's Bay, Devlin and Emmerich, this movie clocks in
at just around 2hrs and 10 minutes, only about 30 mins short of Armageddon,
and about the same as Godzilla, yet, I didn't even notice, nor check the time
at any point, because I have was having a great time, see guys, a movie can
be long, and effective still, Size Does Matter, but so does quality)
I commented the other day, that it had been a long while since I had truly
laughed at movie, In & Out, last year, although not this much, and The
Birdcage two years ago, are the only ones that I can remember rivaling the
merriment of this movie, but be forewarned, this movie is not for all.        It is
very dark, and the humor is quite crude, and possibly offensive, so take that
into consideration, but if you sat through the first two movies by these
guys, than this one won't shock you, but rather take their craft one step
farther, and come into their own, as makers of honest, dark, real, comedies.
See this one, if you have a strong stomach, and an open mind
-----== Posted via Deja News, The Leader in Internet Discussion ==-----
http://www.dejanews.com/rg_mkgrp.xp   Create Your Own Free Member Forum

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Count the funny one-liners.  That's the measure of most good
comedies today.
     The Farrelly brothers, Bobby and Peter, who brought us DUMB &
DUMBER and KINGPIN, take an entirely different approach.  Relying on
funny plots, as opposed to single lines, and on great physical comedy,
they manage in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY to produce a movie that
should come with two warnings.  One, people may laugh so hard, as our
audience did, that they are in danger of rupturing internal organs.
(At our advanced screening, I heard louder laughter than at any movie
since PRIVATE PARTS.  The laughs sounded like small explosions.) Two,
the Farrelly brothers are proudly ignorant as to what might constitute
inappropriate humor.
     The story starts in a high school in Rhode Island, where the nerdy
Ted is trying to find a date for the prom.  Thus far all he has been
able to get is one homely girl who says that she might go with him if
things don't work out with her intended date.  Through an incredible
stroke of luck, the most beautiful girl in the school, the lithe and
dazzling Mary Jenson, asks him to be her date.  Mary, everyone agrees,
is "a fox."
     With enough metal in his mouth to set off airport metal detectors,
Ben Stiller from FLIRTING WITH DISASTER plays the unconfident Ted.  In
one of her best performances yet, Cameron Diaz plays Mary with grace
and charm.  Comedy comes so naturally to Diaz that she seems to be
barely acting.  Her performance is as captivating as it is funny.
     Ted and Mary's date is not to be.  Dressed in a tan and taupe tux,
Ted goes to the bathroom at Mary's house and has that problem of which
all men live in fear.  He gets it caught in his zipper.  It is in this
long sequence that the movie first demonstrates its comedic brilliance.
Most movies would dissolve into bad slapstick if they attempted to stay
with this one idea for so long.  The Farrelly's, helped by the
extremely expressive Stiller, keep the joke going for longer that you
would ever image, and they make it much more explicit than you might
guess.  The result is sure to have at least half of the audience
grimacing in pain as everyone laughs so hard their sides may split.
     (The stuck-in-the-zipper routine isn't even close to the movie's
most outlandish part.  Much later there is a masturbation sequence so
funny that it almost brings the house down with laugher.)
     The movie skips ahead 13 years with the now reasonably handsome
Ted wanting to find the girl of his dreams.  Although he lost touch
with Mary after high school, he has never gotten her out of his mind so
he employees a slime ball investigator named Pat Healy to locate her
down in Florida.  Matt Dillon plays the offensive detective with a
small brain and a large libido.
     Since Healy falls for Mary, he tells Ted that Mary has bloated up
to whale-sized proportions with four kids from three men and no rock on
her finger.  Plus she's in a wheelchair, etc.
     Healy starts eavesdropping on Mary with electronic surveillance
equipment.  Whatever he overhears her saying she wants, he does - even
getting himself some oversized teeth caps when he misunderstands her.
     Mary's next-door neighbor, Magda (Lin Shaye), has been in the
Florida sun so long that her skin has turned to leather.  Her breasts
are even worse.
     This just gives you a flavor of this uproarious movie.  I'll let
you experience the rest yourselves.  And I haven't even mentioned the
flaming dog or a hundred other hilarious parts of this high-energy
delight.  Many of the scenes have unprintable descriptions anyway.
     THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY runs 1:55.  It is rated R for strong
comic sexual content and language and would be fine for most teenagers.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (director/writer: Peter and Bobby Farrelly;
screenwriter: Ed Decter/John J. Strauss; cinematographer: Mark Irwin;
cast: Ben Stiller (Ted), Cameron Diaz (Mary), Matt Dillon (Healy), Chris
Elliott (Dom), Lin Shaye (Magda), Lee Evans (Tucker), Jeffrey Tambor
(Sully), W. Earl Brown (Warren), Markie Post (Mary's Mom), Keith David
(Mary's Stepfather), Jonathan Richman (Singer), Brett Favre (Brett),
1998)
There's Something About Mary is a very funny film; it makes the most out
of being politically incorrect, profane, obnoxious, and settling for an
unsophististicated juvenile humor to tide itself over while the romantic
side of its tale fizzles. It makes fun of the retarded, abuses a pet dog
to a point of near death, and makes no apology for being so crude. There
are many other things that the film does wrong, but the bottom line is
that it is funny in a way that is not mean-spirited. If the film could
be faulted, it is because it runs too long and seemed sluggish at times,
and the romantic tale was pointless.
It starts in Rhode Island, 1985, when the teenage sad sack, Ted
Stroehmann (Ben Stiller), is looking for a date to the prom after being
cruelly rejected by a calculating co-ed. But his luck soon changes, as
he is asked to the prom by the perfect girl, the heartthrob of the high
school, Mary Jensen (Cameron Diaz), when Ted defends her retarded
brother Warren (W. Earl Brown) who is being picked on. But his prom date
turns out to be a disaster. When picking up Mary in her house, he is
unmercifully ribbed by Mary's black stepfather (Keith) and then beaten
up by Warren (Ted had touched Warren's ears and Warren doesn't let
anyone touch his ears). Ted then excuses himself to go to the bathroom
and is staring at two birds by the window, when they fly away he is
spotted by Mary as she is undressing and she thinks he is scoping her.
Ted is startled to see her look of disgust and catches himself in his
zipper, which results in a hilarious bit, where he is taken to the
hospital and misses the prom. It is funny because it is so grossly done
that, at first, it is hard to believe how far this tasteless gag is
going, but it is taken to the hilt, as the police and fire departments
arrive and the neighborhood gets to see an unusual occurrence, it even
ends with the showing of the wounded private part.
It is now 13 years later in Rhode Island and Ted is a lonely writer,
telling his slimy friend Dom (Chris Elliott) that he hasn't seen the one
girl he loves in all that time, only knowing that she moved to Miami
Beach. Dom talks him into getting a private eye who works in his place
to go down there and see if he can locate her for him. The sleazy
investigator, Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), finds Mary in Miami and falls for
her, so much so, that he quits his job in Rhode Island and moves to
Miami to romance her. To find out what she's like and what's she looking
for in a guy, he eavesdrops on her conversations, using a hidden
microphone and thusly sets himself up to become her dream man. That will
become the running gag for the remainder of the movie. But, he is so
crude, that even though he knows exactly what she wants, he still blows
it but acting like a jerk.
Ted is able to find out that the private detective lied to him about
Mary and decides to drive down there by himself to see her. When he
picks up a weirdo hitchhiker and can't take his rap anymore stopping by
the road in South Carolina to relieve himself, he stumbles upon a
homosexual orgy and is arrested on a live TV program, which his friend
Dom sees. He will go down there to help Ted, who is now being charged
with not only indecent exposure but of being a serial murderer, as the
hitchhiker fled the car leaving his bag with  chopped up body parts on
the front seat. But he is soon cleared of the charges and ends up in
Miami with Dom.
There are some more phony admirers of Mary, led by the deceptive Tucker
(Lee Evans), who acts as a crippled architect, befriending the very
naive Mary and by duplicitous means getting rid of the boys she's
interested in. The combination of these three suitors--the sincere nerd,
Ted, and the pencil-thin mustached private eye charlatan, and the limber
scoundrel Tucker-- all play well off each other. Football player Brett
Favre also gets into the game as a suitor of Mary, and there are a few
other twists in the story which are so-so funny.
Many of the grossly funny bits work to various degrees; such as,
drugging the dog with speed, mocking the mentally retarded kid, having
the results of masturbation be used unwittingly by Mary as hair gel, a
Chris Elliott with zits all over his face, and the withered bare breasts
of an old woman. What didn't work was how stupid and low the comedy had
to go to get its laughs and the whole romantic scene, that without the
comedy would have been a tedious watch.
This raunchy comedy, created by the Farrelly brothers, who gave us Dumb
and Dumber and Kingpin, is a winner only for those who don't mind being
grossed out. I must confess, I laughed a lot during the film, but I
wasn't completely won over with so much comedy that depended on making
fun of someone else's problems. It made the romantic part of the
romantic/comedy seem unneeded... . As a nice added touch, the film had a
singing troubadour, Jonathan Richman, appearing throughout the film in
various settings to sing about Mary and what makes her so special.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Berge Garabedian
The Farrelly Brothers' third film, after DUMB AND DUMBER (7.5/10) and
KINGPIN (8/10), brings together the real-life couple of Cameron Diaz
and Matt Dillon, some nasty humour, a cute dog, and a mix of love, fate
and romance.
PLOT:
High-school nerd Ted gets lucky when the cutest girl in his class asks
him to the prom. Unfortunately for Ted, he accidentally gets a part of
his male anatomy (ouch!) caught in his zipper, and misses the big
night. Thirteen years later, Ted still can't get Mary out of his mind,
and hires a private detective (Dillon) to find her. Once found, it
turns out that Mary has more than one suitor, and that's when the real
fun begins.
CRITIQUE:
Likeable comedy with a few extremely funny scenes, some funny looking
people, and a plot that won't ever put you to sleep. Having said that,
I must admit that I did like the Farrellys' two previous films more
than this one, but that is saying a lot, since I really did love those
earlier pics. This one is also quite funny, but it didn't really blow
me away like the others. Then again, maybe my expectations were too
high. Then again, maybe I should shut up, and write a little more about
the film, and less about my supposed subconscious reasons for
liking/disliking the film.
Continuing where their other pictures left off, the Farrellys' create a
cutesy world of people with strange and endearing qualities, and a
simple plot by which to tie them all together. This one also includes
plenty of toilet humour, but also some borderline fun-making of the
disabled and mentally-challenged. I must admit that I really wasn't
sure whether to laugh at some points or not. Not a good place to be.
Having said that, the scenes that did tear through the audience, and
yours truly, were extremely hilarious, and went on for several minutes
after the punchline. The laughter practically killed out the next scene
for one of the best ones in the movie (something to do with hair gel).
On the negative end, I did not like the musical interludes of Jonathan
Richman that ran through the entire picture. I found them quite
useless, unfunny and distracting. Also, I found that a lot of the
funnier scenes had already been shown in the film's trailer. And of
course, I never quite buy the fact that these beautiful, intelligent,
single women still can't seem to find the "right guy" (see KISS THE
GIRLS (7/10). I did really like all of the actors in the film,
especially Ben Stiller, who appears to be solidifying his mark as a
great comical actor with this picture and one of my favourites from
1996, FLIRTING WITH DISASTER (8/10). I also liked Matt Dillon with his
big teeth, and Lee Evans with his superb faux-sympathy British accent.
Funny stuff. Also, make sure that you stay for the credits, because
there is an entire montage of outtakes from the film that plays under a
lip-synched version of "Build me up buttercup", which is really cool.
Overall, a cute comedy with a decent premise, and a few particularly
hilarious scenes.
Little Known Facts: 
The Farrellys big break came when they somehow got a copy of their
script "Dust to Dust" into the hands of Eddie Murphy via  Murphy's
neighbour. They only found out about Murphy's interest, when they saw
Eddie mention the script on the David Letterman show one night.
Matt Dillon is a high school dropout. In between acting gigs, Dillon
has branched out into the restaurant business. Close to home in his
native New York, he co-owns both a bar called the Whiskey and a swanky
uptown eatery called the Falls.
Cameron Diaz stands 5"9, started working as a model at the early age of
16, and loves cats.
Ben Stiller's father is Jerry Stiller. He played George Costanza's
(Jason Alexander) father on TV's "Seinfeld".
Peter Farrelly has written a novel entitled "Outside Providence" which
is currently being filmed starring Alec Baldwin.
Rob Moran, who plays the cop in this film, also played the millionaire
bowler in KINGPIN, and the bartender in DUMB AND DUMBER. He is old
friends with the Farrelly Brothers from College, and is currently
married to Entertainment Tonight anchor/correspondant Julie Moran.
Harland Williams, who plays the nutty hitchhiker in this film, also
played a state trooper in the Farrelly's earlier DUMB AND DUMBER, and
was the star of the unfortunate ROCKET MAN.


Author
Matt Williams
Peter and Bobby Farrelly (the writer/directors of Dumb and Dumber, and
Kingpin) have turned their sights onto a romantic comedy.  And in
There's Something About Mary, the masters of bad taste have managed to
create a surprisingly good film, their best work to date.
Ben Stiller plays Ted, a writer, who is still struggling with a teenage
crush formed thirteen years ago.  Back then, he, a pathetic loser, fell
in love with Mary (Cameron Diaz), the most beautiful girl in school.
Alas, fate intervened and kept them apart, but Ted has been stricken
ever since.
Following the advice of his best friend (Chris Elliott), Ted hires a
sleazy private detective named Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down his
long lost love. However, when Pat finds her, he discovers there's
something about Mary that makes just about every man fall in love with
her.  Pat decides to forget about Ted and pursue Mary himself.
This may sound like your typical run-of-the-mill romantic comedy, but
don't be fooled.  The Farrelly brothers have applied their unique comic
sensibilities, and manage to toe one step further over the line.
There's Something About Mary is crude, vulgar, offensive, and in
exceedingly bad taste, but it's painfully funny.  Not every joke hits
its intended target, but plenty of them do.
Unlike the previous Farrelly films, the characters aren't merely stupid
people doing stupid things.  Instead, there's actually some time spent
developing the characters.  Granted, they still are pretty flat, but it
is a giant step forward. Surprisingly, the additional depth makes the
humor all the more funny (because we're finally able to see it in
contrast).
The cast is outstanding.  Ben Stiller manages to inspire just the right
amount of pity for his pathetic loser.  Matt Dillon makes appropriate
amounts of slime seethe from his pores.  And Cameron Diaz...well, she
fills the role.  She doesn't get to enjoy the comic romping of her
costars, but she simply radiates charm.
If you are easily offended, skip this one, for there's something here
that'll offend even the most jaded moviegoer.  However, if you're open
for low humor (and this one gets as low as it goes), There's Something
About Mary may be the funniest movie you've seen in quite a while.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 500 reviews, and information on over 600 upcoming releases

Author
Scott Renshaw
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY
(20th Century Fox)
Starring:  Cameron Diaz, Ben Stiller, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris
Elliott, Lin Shaye, W. Earl Brown.
Screenplay:  Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly & Bobby
Farrelly.
Producers:  Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas & Charles B.
Wessler.
Directors:  Peter Farrelly and Bobby Farrelly.
MPAA Rating:  R (profanity, adult humor, sexual situations, brief nudity)
Running Time:  115 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     I'll worry tomorrow about whether I've consigned myself to Film
Critic Hell; today, I'm still waiting for my cheeks and sides to recover.
I'll worry tomorrow about whether or not the Farrelly brothers portend the
end of civilization as we know it; today, I'm still grateful someone is
willing to push the comedic envelope into heretofore unknown ZIP codes.
Tomorrow I many not believe I've sent the following words to an
unsuspecting world:  today, I believe THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is the
funniest comedy I've seen in this decade.
     It may also be the most consistently, unapologetically tasteless
comedy I've seen this decade.  After all, these are the Farrelly brothers
we're talking about, the same fellows who turned laxatives and "milking a
bull" into comic stomach-churners in DUMB AND DUMBER and KINGPIN.  This
time around they tell the story of Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz), every man's
fantasy:  she's beautiful, intelligent, and she loves beer, hot dogs and
football.  The film opens in 1985, where geeky Ted Stroehmann (Ben 
Stiller) is on the verge of taking the stunning Mary to his high school
prom.  Fate intervenes, however, and thirteen years later Ted is still
thinking about Mary as the one that got away.  At the insistence of his
friend Dom (Chris Elliott), Ted hires insurance claims investigator Pat
Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down Mary in Florida.  Little does Ted know
that Pat is about to become as infatuated with Mary as he is, leading to a
romantic triangle which rapidly becomes a square, then a pentagon, then...
     Never mind.  The plot is really beside the point.  THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY is really a collection of comedy-of-errors set pieces which 
find gags in the mentally handicapped, the physically handicapped,
stalking, masturbation, anonymous homosexual encounters, serial killings
and the unspeakable horror of getting..."it"...caught in one's zipper.  If
that kind of subject matter seems more likely to have you grimacing than
guffawing, don't say I didn't warn you:  there's even more where that came
from.  
     Viewers with less delicate sensibilities, on the other hand, may be
hoarse at the end of a relentlessly raucous two hours.  It's unfair to
spoil the moments with specifics; half the fun in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY comes from I-can't-believe-they-did-that reactions.  Suffice to say
that nearly everything works, from the surrealist use of alt-rock icon
Jonathan Richman as the film's narrator/troubadour to the subverted
romantic montage, from the perfectly-pitched charm of Diaz (rapidly
becoming the most appealing screen actress of her generation, if she's not
there already) to the goofy appeal of Stiller.  THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT
MARY recalls BLAZING SADDLES-era Mel Brooks, or AIRPLANE!-era
Zucker-Abrahams-Zucker -- back-brain humor which will be as dumb and/or
offensive to some viewers as it is hilarious to others.  Brilliant, it
ain't; brilliantly executed, it is.
     There are a couple of slow patches in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY,
which probably runs longer than advisable at nearly two hours.  When it
pauses long enough to pretend that the character relationships matter,
or to explain a rather unnecessary plot twist, the film could have you
shifting in your seat.  Fortunately, they're only momentary distractions
between laughs that beat down your logical objections, building and
building until they add up to more laughs than you can remember at the
movies.  I'm not proud of the fact that I'd rather sit through THERE'S
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY again than any one of the inspid romantic comedies of
the past five years that generally passed for comic entertainment, but I
would.  I'll worry about what that means tomorrow.

Author
Christopher Null
     Sure it's ridiculous.  Sure it's in generally poor taste.  So what? 
That's what makes THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY so good.
     If you've seen the trailer, you know the story: Ted (Stiller) finally
gets to go out with Mary (Diaz) to the prom and is stymied by a freak zipper
accident, sending him into years of therapy to wonder what-coulda-been. 
Thirteen years later, we find that he's not the only one fixated on Mary...
as no fewer than five suitors appear to win her heart.
     Done one way, this could've been a Disney movie.  Done the Farrelly
brothers (DUMB AND DUMBER) way, it's anything but.
     Frankly, I prefer the Farrelly brothers way, because it's just so damn
hilarious.  Most of the funny bits have unfortunately be spoiled by the
trailer, but it's no matter; MARY's still got plenty of juice in her.
     (Note to potential filmgoers: The overly sensitive need not apply.)
Director: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Producer: Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Bradley Thomas, Charles B.
Wessler
Writer: Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Starring: W. Earl Brown, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Chris Elliott, Brett
Favre, Ben Stiller
-Christopher Null  /  null@sirius.com  /  Writer-Producer  / 
http://www.filmcritic.com

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: July 10, 1998
Starring: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris
Elliott, Lin Shaye, W. Earl Brown, Brett Favre
Directed by: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Distributed by: 20th Century Fox Film Corp.
MPAA Rating: R (strong comic sexual content, language)
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/theres.htm 
About the time that the pre-release hype for SAVING PRIVATE RYAN was
reaching a full head of steam, the new Farrelly Brothers movie, THERE'S
SOMETHING ABOUT MARY was making its own waves in the ratings pool.
Skeptics and antagonists pointed out that MARY had some content that was
arguably unsuitable for mass distribution. The Farrelly Brothers
responded by saying that test audiences had responded well to the movie
and were not worried about "crossing the line." After the film has seen
wide release, now, it's easy to see that there's some truth to both
sides of the debate. MARY is a textbook exercise in crude humor, but at
the same time it's saved by its own quirky cuteness. 
Ben Stiller is Ted Stroehmann, an unlikely 1960s prom date for Mary
Jensen (Cameron Diaz). Ted makes it to Mary's house on prom night, but
due to a terrible misfortune in the bathroom, Ted doesn't make it
through the rest of the night. Instead, he's taken to the hospital, and
he doesn't see Mary again when she moves from Rhode Island to Florida
with her parents later that summer. Now, in the present day, Ted still
cannot forget his love for Mary, and so, by his friend Dom (Chris
Elliot)'s reference, he contacts a private investigator named Pat Healy
(Matt Dillon) to find Mary again. Healy does, but instead of going back
to Ted, Healy falls in love with Mary and begins to romance her. This
all goes well until two things happen: Tucker, one of Mary's friends and
also a secret lover, interferes with Healy's plans; and, Ted finds out
for himself where Mary is and goes to meet her anyway. 
The plot is not nearly as convoluted as it may seem, and is quite easily
followed when it plays out onscreen. The actors have all got the
business down adaquately enough, although none of them is as outrageous
as they should be for this sort of off-kilter Gen-X comedy. Stiller is
the most impressive here, and after his limp performance in 1996's
FLIRTING WITH DISASTER, it's nice to see him play a better character
with more feeling. Cameron Diaz adds the appropriate amounts of
attractiveness, sexual tension, and allure in the right places,
makingthe cast seem realistic in their actions to fall head over heals
for Mary. Although the plot gets occasionally sidetracked in unlikely
spots, it goes from start to finish with little interruption and doesn't
get boring. And, for a Packers fan, the Brett Favre cameo near the end
has quite possibly some of the best lines of dialogue spoken onscreen
this year. 
For those who've followed SOMETHING ABOUT MARY's progress on the weekend
gross charts, it's clear where the downfall to MARY's humor is. The
physical and mostly brainless comedy isn't done well or in particularly
good taste, and as such it's got quite a limited audience. SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY has stayed on the charts for an outstanding length of time -
better than most movies in current release - but it's never risen above
number three out of the top ten. These results, along with the final
product itself, underscore the fact that any genius in MARY is limited
to the genre. Fans will see it again and again, but it will be a tough
sell to those interested in more serious dramas or sci-fi/fantasy. It's
a workable movie, but not necessarily for everyone.
FINAL AWARD FOR "SOMETHING ABOUT MARY": 2.5 stars - an enjoyable movie.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:   Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Lee Evans,
            W. Earl Brown
DIRECTORS:  Bobby and Peter Farrelly
WRITERS:    Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, and the Farrelly Brothers
RATED/YEAR: R/1998
        Everybody loves Mary (Cameron Diaz), and it's easy to understand
why: not only is she beautiful, intelligent, funny, and financially secure,
she has the proverbial heart of gold as well.  She places other people's
needs well above her own, to the extent of spending all her free time doing
volunteer work with the mentally retarded, a group that includes her
beloved brother Warren (W. Earl Brown).  Men can't resist Mary, and that's
her biggest problem: she's constantly (and unintentionally) attracting
losers when she wants a soulmate.
        Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller), Mary's high-school sweetheart, has
never been able to forget her.  After learning that she moved to Miami
after graduation, he hires a private investigator named Pat Healy (Matt
Dillon) to track her down.  If it turns out that she's still single, perhaps
he'll be able to win her back.  Unfortunately, Healy also falls in love with
Mary after he locates and meets her.  The two men suddenly find themselves,
along with numerous other guys, in a fierce battle to win her heart... and
they will stop at nothing, and I mean *nothing*, to end up with Mary in
their arms.
        That's the intriguing premise of "There's Something About Mary,"
the surprisingly funny new film from the Farrelly Brothers, the duo who
brought you "Dumb and Dumber" and "Kingpin."  They've come a long way since
then.  "Mary" is far more mature (on the whole) than either of its
predecessors, which too often relied on potty humor involving wee-wees,
bathroom noises, and uncovered bottoms.  Instead, "Mary" gives us
characters that are actually interesting, rather than merely serving as
transitions from one sight gag to the next.
        That's not to say that "Mary" is lacking in the humor department,
however.  There are lots of laughs to be found, and the scenes featuring
the cute little dog belonging to Mary's next-door neighbor Magda (Lin
Shaye) are almost painfully funny.  Unlike "Dumb and Dumber," "There's
Something About Mary" wisely allows the jokes to serve a story that's
clever and interesting in its own right.  The result is a film that leaves
you laughing even as you wonder what's going to happen next.
        Matt Dillon's performance as Pat Healy, the private investigator,
is tremendously entertaining.  After eavesdropping on a conversation between
Mary and her girlfriends, he discovers that she wants to meet a guy who
loves to travel to "exotic places like Nepal."  Her mystery man must also
be creative (like an architect, for instance), and he must love sports.
This gives Dillon's character the opportunity to introduce himself as a
freelance architect and football nut, who owns a condo in Katmandu.  In
another attempt to impress her, he proudly states that he "loves working
with retards."  Mary is of course aghast at his crassness, but he doesn't
catch on.  He then explains how he keeps his "little retard friend Mongo"
locked up in a cage, but allows him to run around the yard on one of those
"clothesline-leash things."  The scene is brilliantly played by both Diaz
and Dillon: just witness the way Mary is torn between repulsion and
adoration for Healy, and the way he simply doesn't get why his crass
remarks offend her.
        Stiller, as the high-school sweetheart, is fun as the straight
man.  He never tries to be anything he's not: all he wants is another chance
with the girl of his dreams.  Perhaps this is why he's so appealing to us.
Other less important characters drift in and out of the film, including
Mary's British friend Tucker (Lee Evans), who plays a bigger role in her
life than we might originally expect.
        "There's Something About Mary" contains moments of true comic
genius, but alas, it sometimes shows chinks in its armor.  The directors
seem unsure whether its target audience, the "Dumb and Dumber" fans, will
be able to handle a story of this caliber, so they revert to the "potty
humor" standby a little too often.  The opening scene, for example, in
which a high-school-age Ben Stiller gets ready to take Mary to the prom,
features a much-too-long segment in which our hero gets his male anatomy
caught in his zipper.  (Sarcasm: Boy, *that's* funny.)  Another scene,
which coincedentally involves an *adult* Ben Stiller bathroom penis
adventure, is even more tasteless.  The packed audience howled with
laughter at both of these scenes; I scowled and rolled my eyes.  (Sarcasm:
Wow, that's even *funnier*.)  And I guess I'm the only person in the world
who does not find anything amusing about a man getting his crotch bitten
by a dog.  (That's three Ben Stiller penis jokes in the same movie, folks.
I think the directors have some latent issues they need to work through.)
        The mostly clever screenplay only falters once more: early in the
film, we learn that Mary's brother Warren tends to go ballistic when
someone he doesn't trust touches his ears.  After seeing this happen twice,
I predicted that by the end of the film, Warren would allow one of Mary's
suitors to touch his ears, and Mary would use this as a factor in deciding
which one she wanted to date.  I was not wrong.  (And please don't accuse
me of giving away a plot point; if you CAN'T see this coming, you should
have your film-watching license revoked.)
        Overall, though, "There's Something About Mary" is a treat.
Cleverly written, with characters who are an absolute joy to watch, this
is one that should be seen by anyone who's ever pined over "the one who
got away."  With this role, Cameron Diaz finds herself one step closer to
super-stardom.
        Oh, be sure to stay for the end credits, which feature a Jackie
Chan-style montage of outtakes and cut scenes.  Seeing the cast and crew
lip-synching along to the '60s pop classic "Build Me Up, Buttercup" is 
almost worth the price of admission by itself.
This review was written: August 3, 1998
Copyright (c) 1998 by Joe Barlow.  This review may be freely distributed as
long as ABSOLUTELY NO CHANGES are made and this disclaimer remains attached.
It may not be reproduced for profit without the written consent of the
author.  If you have comments or questions, please send them to: jbarlow
at earthling dot net (substituting the appropriate symbols, to discourage
spam).
-----
  "Average Joe" Barlow * MiSTie #73097 * Writer/musician/aspiring filmmaker
       jbarlow@YOURearthling.PANTSnet http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow
              {Remove YOUR PANTS to e-mail me.}        
    "When I bite into a York Peppermint Patty, I imagine I'm...
     spitting it into the trash!" - Joel/Woemcats

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
It was with great trepidation that I approached +Mary+, the Farrelly
brothers+ latest film.  I knew the film would be funny--the trailer
alone had me laugh harder than the actual comedy I went to see.  But I
also knew the film would be an equal-opportunity offender, attacking the
sensibilities of the politically correct with reckless abandon.  I
figured the film would be raunchy, maybe another lucky escapee from
NC-17 hell.  I may laugh, but would I feel better in the morning?
I needn+t have worried.  +Mary+ is the sweetest, warmest, all-out
laugh-and-grossfest this side of _Animal House_.  Surprisingly, the
Farrelly brothers have walked that very tight line of making a touching
romantic comedy on the side, and filling the details with five or six
outrageous howlers.  They make laughter, the toughest job for a
filmmaker to do, look easy.
The plot is typical.  Thirteen years ago, geeky Ted (Ben Stiller) lucked
out in having dazzling Mary (Cameron Diaz) go with him to the senior
prom.  As luck would have it, on that very day, he was hospitalized.
Why, I shall not tell, but I assure you, it isn+t pretty.
He hires a private investigator to find her: Pat Healy (Matt Dillon).
He becomes one of the great comic villains.  Upon finding her, he too is
lovestruck, and so pursues her, lying about his occupation and getting
his teeth capped.  It is only a matter of time before Ted finds out that
he had been double-crossed, and goes to get her for himself.
Would the geek get the girl?  Puh-lease.  The ending is pure Hollywood;
no surprises there.  But the absolute joy in this film is how this
simple premise allows for humor in zippers, hair gel, the mentally
disabled, the physically handicapped, interracial marriages,
homosexuals, skin conditions, serial killers, tanning, and drugged-up
dogs.  The dog on speed sequence alone is worth the price of admission,
and belongs in the Film Comedy Hall of Fame.
And yet, for all the targets that are hit, the film maintains its sweet
tone.  Mary, playing the straight role, is as sweet and caring as she is
beautiful.  She is totally devoted to caring for her mentally
handicapped brother, Warren (W. Earl Brown--miles away from the
cameraman in _Scream_).  Mary+s sunniness carries the film here--it
compliments the below-belt gags that come at you.  Cameron Diaz makes
her totally charming, and the audience respects her, even though women
in general do not usually undress before an open window.
Ben Stiller also fares very well, totally changing his image from his
_Reality Bites_ and _Flirting with Disaster_ straight men to being a,
(how to say it?), a complete loser.  Braces, greasy long hair, not too
bright, and very very funny.  Dillon is exceptionally creepy, especially
with his capped teeth.  And rounding out the cast is Ted+s friend Dom
(Chris Elliot), tanning addict Magda (Lin Shaye), modern troubador/Greek
chorus Ron Lichman, and Mary+s sweet mom, Markie Post (where has she
been?!).
Not everything works.  Chris Elliot+s role, skin blemishes and all,
becomes merely tasteless and boring.  There+s lousy dialogue about
eight-minute vs. seven minute exercise tapes.  And there are long
stretches without much going on.  But the wait is worth it.  When those
extraordinary sequences hit, the entire theater erupted with howls,
tears. belly-aches, that in some sequences carried over to the following
scene.
The Farrelly brothers have finally done it.  Yes, there are some raunchy
bits, but when it is all over, it+s not nearly as bad as it could have
been. While tasteless, it didn+t cross any lines, at least not with me.
While raunchy, it wasn+t nearly as bad as _Porky+s_ or _Boogie Nights_.
And it is sweet enough to be considered a date flick.  After the funny
but sour _Kingpin_ left a negative aftertaste in my palate, comes the
funniest sex farce since _A Fish Called Wanda_. Approach this with an
open mind, and you will reap the benefits hugely.

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

My purgatory for watching "Godzilla" -- and dragging friends along with
me -- has come to an end this week.  Not only did I see the wacky
French existentialist film with two minutes of motorcycle action and
rioting poets this past weekend ("Orpheus"), I also watched one of the
funniest movies I've seen in a long, long time, "Something About
Mary."  We'll ignore "Armageddon"-as-comedy.
"Something About Mary" is a great screwball romantic comedy starring
Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Chris Elliot and, as the luminescent Mary,
Cameron Diaz.  The film opens in high school, early 1980s, with an
awfully nerdy Ted (Ben Stiller) -- bad hair, thick-rimmed glasses,
braced teeth and all -- about to go to the prom with Mary.  Mary is a
pure vision of light and beauty, able to bestow grace on this corrupt
old world by her mere presence.  Ted, at her house to pick her up for
the prom, uses the bathroom and has an accident with his tuxedo
zipper.  It's a shocking accident, making even hardened cops and
firemen wince when seeing it: "How did you manage to close the zipper?"
While this gag is drawn out for an amazingly long time, it maintains
its effect.  In any case, it's only two weeks in the hospital for Ted,
but no prom with Mary; she moves away the next month.
Thirteen years later, Ted still thinks about Mary, and hires Pat,
played by Matt Dillon, a part time private investigator, to find her in
Miami.  He does, but is utterly smitten with her.  Pat lies to Ted,
describing Mary as 250lbs of paraplegic trailer trash, then moves to
Miami, where he creates a false identity for himself, haphazardly
constructed from eavesdropping on Mary and her friends, as they talk
about what they're looking for in men: a worldly architect, with ties
to Nepal, able to be kind to Mary's mentally challenged brother,
Warren.  In the meantime, Ted realizes that he's been lied to, and
heads down to Florida to see Mary.
Yes, the stalking themes are blatant in this movie (though, you know,
with the Web, we have things like the Cameron Diaz Internet Shrine,
http://www.geocities.com/~camerondiaz/shrine.html).  There's also an
extremely violent fight with a dog on speed, public masturbation, a
prison scene with a huge cell-mate, references to serial killing and
the wonderful, glorious Buttercup song, all done with cleverness and
care.  The Farrelly Brothers, who wrote and directed the film -- they
also did "Dumb and Dumber" and "King Pins", but don't hold it against
them -- basically string a series of very funny episodes into the
story, some pushing the boundaries of good taste.  1990s Woody Allen
this ain't.  Some are wonderful, almost wordless set pieces of physical
comedy, true ROTFL material.  They have their timing dead on, and the
cast is wonderful.  Ben Stiller makes you care about Ted (I had braces,
bad hair in high school), and Cameron Diaz makes Mary into a vision.
I've actually only seen her in "The Mask" before, but she's fantastic.
Thinking a bit about Ben Stiller, this is a better film than "Flirting
With Disaster", with him, Patricia Arquette and Tea Leoni.  Not quite
the semi-serious theme of questing for one's identity, one's roots --
"Mary" is pure romantic comedy after all -- but just funnier.  The
Farrelly's take more liberties with reality, coming up with more
bizarre scenarios as the film goes on, and they get away with it.
Oh, part of the film was filmed in Providence, RI.  The Farrelly
Brothers are apparently from there.  I actually thought some of the
scenes were at Harvard Square, but what do I know?  Brown U. folks may
be pleased.
Since this was part of that film class thing, there were interviews.
Actually, two of them, before and after the movie.  Before the movie,
we had Steve Buscemi, talking a bit about "Armageddon", and then Ben
Stiller.  I was hoping for Cameron Diaz, but, alas.
Buscemi was talking about the casting process for "Armageddon": they
had the Rockhound role sort of ready for him, and, after he signed on,
tailored it to be a Buscemi character.  He said he signed the day after
buying a Brooklyn brownstone.  Other trivia included talking about the
premiere party at NASA, Cape Canaveral, where they got Aerosmith to
perform.  This party probably cost much more than "Tree's Lounge".  As
he noted, big films have certain perks, like meeting astronauts and
walking underneath the space shuttle as it was being prepped for launch
("Don't touch!").  The "Armageddon" shoot was 6-months, with a lot of
his time spent waiting around.  This diverged into a brief discussion
of how important scheduling is for film making, especially a picture as
large as this.  There was a "Reservoir Dogs" note, also: Mr. Blue,
Edward Bunker, was an ex-con -- armed robbery -- who became a novelist
in later life.  He did informal technical advice for "Dogs".  I don't
remember what Mr. Blue looks like.
Ben Stiller talked a bit about his career, and a bit about shooting
"Mary".  The trivia included the dog fight scene.  He apparently spent
a good part of one day with a fake dog attached to his crotch.  When
they said, "Action!", he's start spinning around, screaming.  When they
said, "Cut!", he'd stop, and wait around for the next sequence, still
with the dog attached to his crotch.  They also had to sing "Buttercup"
at the end of every scene: the outtakes from this was used in the end
credits.  It's a wonderful way to cap off the film.

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Cameron Diaz; Matt Dillon; Ben Stiller; Lee Evans & Chris Elliott
There's Something About Mary is, by far, the funniest movie that I have seen
this year. It is also one of the funniest films that I have ever seen,
period. A fair warning to all of you out there who are easily offended --
stay far away from this movie. Some of the scenes in this baby would make a
sailor blush, although that same sailor would probably be falling off his
seat laughing as he was watching. Mary centers on a one-time high school
geek played by Ben Stiller who wants to be reunited with the girl of his
high school dreams, Mary (Cameron Diaz). He enlists a sleazy investigator
(Matt Dillon) to find her. This is the story of his adventures trying to woo
the girl of his dream. That is a major simplification but if I told you any
more, I'd have to kill you. All right, maybe just a little more. Stiller
sends Dillon down to Florida where Mary is now living to find out what her
life is like. (I.e., whether she is still single or not.) When Dillon's
character gets down there he falls hopelessly in love with Mary too. So it
then becomes a contest between Stiller and Dillon as to who will win Mary's
heart. (My guess is that they are going after that body too.)
The jokes are nonstop in this film, and much of the comedy is on the
slapstick side. I guarantee you that if you wait to watch this movie on
network television, you will miss the best scenes in the movie. They will
surely edit out possibly the 2 funniest scenes ever put to film (namely Ben
Stiller having a problem with his zipper and Cameron Diaz's hair gel).
Every performance in this film was a great one. I've always though Diaz was
great, but I've never been a huge fan of either Stiller or Dillon (all
though his stock rose considerably after Wild Things). I have to say that
after this film, I'm a fan of both actors. The physical comedy was
choreographed perfectly and I really don't think that the writers could have
fit one more funny moment into this film. It was simply great from start to
finish.
My advice -- There's Something About Mary should only be seen in it's
original uncut version. Any other way would ruin one of the funniest films
you are likely to see in a long time.

Author
Ted Prigge
Directors: Robert Farrelly and Peter Farrelly
Writers: Ed Decter, John J. Strauss, Robert Farrelly, and Peter Farrelly
Starring: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris Elliott,
Lin Shaye, Jeffrey Tambor, Keith David, Markie Post, Harland Williams III,
Richard Jenkins, Helena Christensen, Brett Favre
There's many a disgusting moment in "There's Something About Mary" that it
would be really easy for this film to just be one long toilet joke
film...and that's not totally a bad thing, not if the jokes are actually
funny.  The ones in this film are.  I know that Roger Ebert is the one who
always always always uses the Mel Brooks quote in defense of his film "The
Producers," that his film "rises below vulgarity," but I'm going to steal
that from him and apply it to this film.  This film also rises below
vulgarity, but it takes it a step further as well.
"There's Something About Mary" is a lot like the Farrelly Brothers'
previous two films, "Dumb and Dumber" and "Kingpin," two hilarious films
that proved to even the biggest snob that fart jokes, bodily fluids, and
other forms of toilet humor could be turned into almost an art form.  But
unlike "Dumb and Dumber" and like "Kingpin," this film has a good plot and
characters that we actually care about and maybe in a way identify with. 
The most important thing about making comedy is likable characters, and
this film has that.
But this film's actually deeper than that.  The film deals with the
13-year-long obsession of a young, neurotic man, Ted (Ben Stiller), for a
woman who would be his high school sweetheart, Mary (a glowing Cameron
Diaz) if he had gone to the prom with her...which he didn't because of a
little, um, problem (you've seen it in the trailers - it's even funnier in
the actual film).  Out of desperation to find her because he figures he's
in love with her ("Crushes don't last 13 years, do they?" he asks his
friend, played by Chris Elliott, in his funniest performance in
years...yes, even funnier than he was in "Cabin Boy" *snort*), he hires an
off-kilter detective, Pat Healy (Matt Dillon, also glowing), to track her
down for him.
Pat does find her, and from this point on, the plot becomes completely
convoluted and jumps everywhere.  We meet numerous supporting characters,
like a British architect friend of Mary's (Lee Evans, from "Mouse Hunt"),
who has a little secret (not to mention crutches), and Mary's live-in
roomate (or something), who's been tanning for so long she has passed
George Hamilton on the skin pigmentation chart.  And there's a little dog
that you've seen tons of in the commercials as well, who is also even
funnier in the movie.  I won't tell you how they all fit in to the story
since one of the true joys is trying to follow what's going on, and being
surprised when things happen.
The Farrelly's have a great sense of humor that is somewhere between very
low-brow and scathingly satirical, kinda like Monty Python only even more
disgusting.  They make fun of whomever they want, and aren't afraid to tell
the most disgusting of jokes.  The fact that this is their first film to
get an "R" rating helps because it gives them a liscence to do practically
anything, which for the crowd this film is trying to attract, helps
enormously.  This film is crude, I will admit it, but I admit it with a big
fat grin on my face.  Why do I highly recommend a film where Cameron Diaz
uses a substance I was afraid to mention to my parents for fear of
miscommunication about my "experience" as hair gel?
The answer is two-fold.  One reason is because I laughed my ass off so hard
that I was actually convulsing and hitting the chair in front of me.  I
haven't done that in real long time.  The second and probably not as
important reason is because this film is remarkably intelligent and totally
honest about an intriguing topic, the topic of obsession.  The Farrelly
Brothers have taken a human weakness we all suffer from and have skewered
it into a film that is both funny and brutally frank, not only about its
sense of toilet humor, but also about what it deals with.  Although this
film lives in a surreal world where everyone's a characateur of a certain
weird stereotype laced with acid, and basically anything can and will
happen, we nevertheless can identify with some of the characters in this
film because they're mirrors of us.  Ben Stiller's character is probably
the most human character the Farrelly's have ever dreamed up, and we can
all in some form feel for his obsession because we've all been there at
some point, no matter how badly.  This is a film that has the humanity to
recognize that not only is obsession not love but mere selfish behavior and
that it makes people become more and more pathetic, but it can also lead us
to a greater understanding of ourselves and perhaps even make our
intentions more worthy of someone's affections.
It's often really weird when a film that is this funny also has humanity
and honesty to it.  I'm really shocked at this not only because of that
factor, but also because the humor in this film is actually raised to a
whole other level of thinking.  We laugh at this film not only because of
the outrageous jokes that we are told (most of which I will not divulge),
but also because we can see ourselves in this film, and what is more
therapeutic than to look at ourselves being parodied on the screen, and
laugh right at it?
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Alex Fung
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY (Fox - 1998)
Starring Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller
Screenplay by Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly &
  Bobby Farrelly
Produced by Frank Beddor, Michael Steinberg, Charles B. Wessler,
  Bradley Thomas
Directed by Peter Farrelly & Bobby Farrelly
Running time: 118 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   "There's something about Mary," croons comic troubadour Jonathan
   Richmond by way of explanation at one point in the remarkably silly
   film of the same name, which prompts one to take inventory: as
   portrayed by Cameron Diaz, perpetual object of desire Mary Jenson is
   gorgeous, kindly, wealthy, sunny and altogether charming.  She has
   the propensity to change clothes while standing in front of open
   windows, and even watches SportsCenter, which, needless to say,
   induces one to ponder what's *not* to like about her?  Well, okay,
   she's a golf aficionado -- nobody's perfect.
   The ridiculously idealized Mary is the eye of the vortex in THERE'S
   SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, an assemblage of zany bits of scatological
   humour themed around -- err, stalking.  Unlike the sugar-coated
   nastiness of last year's ADDICTED TO LOVE, though, this year's
   summer stalking comedy (a most improbable genre, one would have
   thought) has a bright, bubbly core; amidst all the crude sight gags,
   the decidedly-politically incorrect witticisms, and lowbrow
   raunchiness, the film has such an infectiously cheerful, carefree
   spirit that its offensive material comes across as mischievous rather
   than malicious.  Indeed, the sibling filmmaking team of Peter and
   Bobby Farrelly clearly take such glee in stretching the limits of
   good taste that it's nigh well irresistible to simply toss decorum
   aside and revel in the bawdiness.
   The film's (semblance of a) plot is a basic underdog tale structured
   around a lovelorn geeky guy named Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) and
   his earnest attempts to woo the seriously-out-of-his-league goddess
   Mary while competing for her affections against a bizarro,
   ever-expanding collection of misfits, chief of which is the caddish
   Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), the private eye whom Ted hired to track Mary
   down.  In its outline, then, it's a tried-and-true, well-worn formula
   which leaves no doubt where the film is headed, though familiarity
   isn't much of an impediment given that the narrative essentially
   serves as a framework for a series of gags.
   There's little doubt where the film's greatest strengths lie; there
   are moments in THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY which are as funny as
   anything that's been released to theatres this year.  And, as per the
   reputation of filmmakers, the humour isn't exactly sly and subtle --
   the comedy is brazen and in many cases quite literally in-your-face,
   all gross sight gags and frenetic slapstick.  In its best moments,
   the silliness is so abundant that one can't help but choke with
   laughter; there's one scene where the audience is lulled into
   complacency by madcap discussion of a certain uncomfortable
   circumstance that when the brothers Farrelly fling the image onscreen
   (in a zoom shot, no less), filling the frame in all its
   wince-inducing glory, it's hilarious not only in its absurdity and
   grotesqueness, but also for its sheer unexpectedness.
   "I can't believe they *showed* that!" murmured someone behind me
   during one of the film's big comic moments.  "That's *so mean*!"
   gasped the woman next to me.  (The guy in front of me was too busy
   howling with laughter to comment.)  The film's humour is so broad and
   unabashedly confident that it often provokes not only laughter, but
   bonafide audience reaction; at the screening I attended, one prime
   sequence left the crowd buzzing so loud and long that the dialogue in
   the entire subsequent scene couldn't even be heard.
   However, this didn't prove to be a problem, and here lies the down
   side of the film.  THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is deliriously
   scatological, tossing practically every sick joke in the book at the
   screen in its attempts to elicit laughs, with a rather iffy success
   rate; its big moments are explosively funny, but more often than not,
   the gags sputter and fizzle, and in between comic crescendos the
   whole thing gets rather dreary.  As a result, the film seems to run
   far too long -- some liberal trimming could have be conducted with
   negligent effect to the narrative while improving the overall pacing.
   In addition, the film curiously seems to consider its romantic angle
   far more sweet than it actually plays, frequently lending a sense of
   sincerity to scenes that isn't really merited.
   Still, while wildly uneven, the film is a hoot, replete with a
   handful of memorably audacious moments.  It left me considering which
   was preferable -- a carefully-modulated picture of consistent
   amusement, or an agreeable one peppered with instances of hilarity,
   like THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY.  While in general I find myself
   leaning towards the former, I can't help but appreciate a film which
   takes the tired Good Times montage endemic to the romantic-comedy
   genre, and gives it a special hook.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"...a first screenplay unaccompanied by a powerful agent or industry
 sponsor is generally a pathetic fetus of a film, nothing more."
                               - Andrew Sarris

Author
Tim Voon
Director: Bobby Farrelly & Peter Farrelly
Writers: Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly & Ed Decter & John J. Strauss
Cast: Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Ben Stiller, Lee Evans, Chris Elliott
There certainly is something about Mary. In one of the funniest and
darkest comedies this year we have a mixture of the vile and the
hilarious, that will keep you simultaneously shocked and amused at the
same time. This seems to be the winning combination for the Farrelly
brother team.
Cameron Diaz is undeniably charming as Mary, who has up to five guys
obsessed with her throughout the movie, if not the entire male audience.
She is the gal of every straight guy's fantasy  pretty, wholesome,
intelligent and outright nice. Of course a woman like Mary doesn't exist
in the real world, that's why we have Hollywood to create the illusion.
There's a lot to disbelieve about Mary, but because we are always
looking for the perfect someone, she exists in all of us.
This movie has interesting ways of dealing with issues like
masturbation, kissing dogs, wrinkled breasts, hair gel, missing sperm,
intellectually disabled people, hives, testes and zippers. Every time
you are on the brink of throwing up, the humour some how pulls you back
in time before you barf in shock. It is a dangerous tight rope of
balancing what is acceptable to watch on screen and pushing the limits
of the viewer's tolerance. This could easily have been a disaster if it
was just out to shock, but the witty script and intelligent plotting
saves the day and somehow makes Mary a success, when it could easily
have been a Turkey.
Other notable notes is Matt Dillon, who plays against his usual
stereotypic role of body hunk and plays a sleaze with big teeth,
graciously. Ben Stiller is wonderfully naďve and everybody else seems to
team up extremely well, making Mary one of the zanniest experiences
you'll come across this Spring.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
There's Something About Mary (1998)
Cameron Diaz, Ben Stiller, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris Elliott, Lin 
Shaye, Jeffrey Tambor, Markie Post, Keith David, W. Earl Brown, Jonathan 
Richman, Harland Williams, Brett Favre. Screenplay, Ed Decter, John J. 
Strauss, Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly, story by Decter, Strauss. 
Directed by Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly. 118 minutes
Rated R, 3 stars (out of five stars) 
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com/film/
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
"There's Something About Mary" is gross and offensive. It's poorly paced, 
often sluggish and about a half hour too long. A lot of the comedy bits 
fall flat and the ones that do work depend on shock value, mining cheap 
laughs from animal abuse, bodily fluids, pratfalls, humiliation and 
injury, while mocking physically and mentally handicapped people along 
with the elderly. Disgusting and utterly juvenile, "There's Something 
About Mary" is also the funniest film I've seen in a very long time. So 
sue me.
Created by the Farrelly brothers, the "visionaries" who gave the world 
"Dumb and Dumber" and "Kingpin," "There's Something About Mary" is the 
kind of no-holds-barred comedy reminiscent of "Blazing Saddles," "Animal 
House" and "Airplane." It's not really in the same league, though. The 
humor in those films was consistent, while "There's Something About Mary" 
only hits the high marks occasionally, with a lot of dead spots in-
between. Oh, but when it works, this puppy is absolutely hilarious.
The story begins in 1985, when Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller), a dorky high-
school student, bonds with the radiant Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz) when he 
attempts to rescue her retarded brother Warren (W. Earl Brown) from a 
bully. Mary asks Ted to the prom and everything's coming up roses for the 
love-struck doofus until that fateful prom night when disaster hits, 
courtesy of a nightmarish escalating series of blunders, culminating in a 
zipper accident of historic proportions.
Cut to 13 years later, when Ted takes the suggestion of his friend Dom 
(Chris Elliott) and hires private eye Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to find out 
where Mary is living. The sleazy detective locates Mary in Miami and 
promptly falls for her. After feeding Ted bogus info to dissuade him from 
pursuing his lost love, Pat uses eavesdropping devices to learn what Mary 
wants in a man, then attempts to become that guy. Meanwhile, Ted learns 
the truth and heads south to try and pick up where he left off before 
that awful night with the zipper.
That's a lot of plot for a comedy and "There's Something About Mary" gets 
sluggish while trying to juggle all of its subplots and characters. 
Speaking of characters, the Farrelly boys aren't exactly famous for well 
drawn ones, and the film spends too much time getting up close and 
personal with some pretty sketchy people. 
When the Farrellys wrench themselves away from the romantic contrivances 
and focus on the big jokes, "There's Something About Mary" kicks into 
high gear. The film contains a generous number of elaborate low-humor set 
pieces that pay off wonderfully, because of the brothers' willingness to 
take things way, way, way over the top. They set up a tasteless gag, then 
carry it light years further than most comic filmmakers would dare. 
The zipper scene, for example, succeeds precisely because of overkill. 
Instead of settling for one painful laugh when poor Ted gets his package 
lodged in those cruel metal teeth, they keep pushing the envelope. Mary's 
father comes to help, humiliating the boy with his horrified double-take. 
Then he calls in Mom for a look-see, as the boy tries desperately to 
crawl behind the wallpaper. Then the police and firefighters arrive. Just 
when you think it's impossible to carry the gruesome joke any farther, 
they do, by giving us an explicit look at Ted's mangled genitals. Oh, the 
humanity!
If you think that's disgusting, skip this movie, because the Farrellys 
are just getting warmed up. There's also the drugged dog scene, the gay 
rest stop scene, the fish hook scene, the leather-skinned old woman's 
bare breast scene, and an extremely gross, incredibly funny masturbation 
bit that delivers one of the film's most side-splitting laughs, thanks to 
Mary's blissfully cheerful ignorance of the ickiness around her.
All the gags don't work, of course. The Farrellys have a fixation with 
facial blemishes and the zit and hives visuals aren't particularly funny. 
Most of the jokes mocking Mary's retarded brother Warren fall flat. The 
audience at the screening I attended were clearly resistant to the whole 
notion of making fun of the disabled. When the film was laughing with 
Warren, they the audience joined in. When it laughed at him, they didn't. 
As the proud father of a retarded son, that was reassuring.
Cameron Diaz and Ben Stiller anchor the film nicely, although Diaz's Mary 
is at times a tad too gullible, even for this sort of comedy. Matt Dillon 
is adequate, while Chris Elliott delivers a creepy variant on his 
standard overconfident goon persona. The film is nicely framed by 
legendary quirk-folk singer Jonathan Richman, singing a number of inanely 
catchy tunes as the film's wandering troubadour.
If anything in this review offended you, skip "There's Something About 
Mary." Otherwise, get ready for some big laughs from a deeply flawed, but 
very funny over-the-top piece of comic anarchy. Either way, you have been 
warned.

Author
Andrew Hicks
        I thought DUMB AND DUMBER was tasteless. I thought KINGPIN 
was even more tasteless. Little did I know the Farrely Brothers' most 
conventional comedy, THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, would have the 
least taste of all. This is a movie where a woman uses semen as hair 
gel, a dog receives electroshock therapy and mouth-to-mouth 
resuscitation (first DR. DOLITTLE, now this -- is 1998 the summer of 
performing mouth-to-mouth on animals for laughs?), and a man traps 
his genitals in his zipper.
        Cameron Diaz, previously one of the more distinguished 
young actresses, presides over the gutteral humor with grace, poise 
and a lot more comedic sense than I would have pegged her for. As the 
title character, she's the object of Ben Stiller's affection. Simian Stiller, 
who has disgraced such movies as THE CABLE GUY and IF LUCY FELL, 
finally picks a good comedy again. It's been two years since FLIRTING 
WITH DISASTER, but Stiller still remembers how to play the horny 
loser role.
        The movie begins in 1985, exploiting the '80s as so many of 
today's comedies manage to do. There's even a Rubik's Cube, for God's 
sake, and the ultimate reminder of the '80s -- Markie Post from "Night 
Court." She plays Diaz's mother, while Some Random Black Guy 
plays the stepfather. (Yes, an afro is mined for laughs.) Less politically 
correct is Diaz's brother, a retarded kid who asks everyone where his 
baseball is and gets picked on. When Stiller stands up for her brother, 
Diaz asks him to the prom and he shows up in a bad tuxedo, all ready 
to go until the Zipper Incident occurs in the bathroom.
        Flashforward to the present, Stiller's bleeding genitalia 
having ruined any chance of happiness with Mary. As a thirtyish loser 
(you know he's a loser because his best friend is Chris Elliot), he 
suddenly decides to look up his old would-be flame, and hires a sleazy 
detective friend of Elliot's to find her. Matt Dillon, looking nothing 
like himself, plays the detective, who gets one look at Diaz in a bra 
and decides he's in love with her.
        It's a fun sitcom plot, the loser guy who pretends to be 
someone else to win the hand of the beautiful woman. This version is 
pretty close to Woody Allen in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU -- Dillon has 
access to inside information about Mary and pretends to be everything 
she wants in a man. She falls for it about the same time Stiller decides 
he has to come to Florida. What ensues is a nonstop saga of disgusting 
humor, a lot of it incredibly funny.
        What THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY boils down to is the first 
romantic comedy about a stalker. Stiller is the least of the evils, in a 
movie where the suitors include the private detective who listens in on 
her conversations, the pizza boy pretending to be an English man in 
arm braces and a shoe fetishist. Surprisingly, for a movie this daring 
in plot and gags, the ending is about as conventional and predictable 
as one could expect. It's a good movie, but when will we see a movie 
this bold that actually functions as satire right to the end?
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Author
Homer Yen
When it comes to matters of the opposite sex, there are two things that
I've always believed in.  First, you'll always go further when you
pretend to be no one else but your true self.  Secondly, guys who are
smitten basically become idiots.  "There's Something about Mary," in its
own perversely funny and raunchy way, illustrates these ideas.
Ever since high school, small-town boy and eternal doofus Ted Stroehmann
(Ben Stiller) has had a crush on Mary (Cameron Diaz).  Mary is a
vibrant, cheery and affable girl.  But she has a soft spot for those who
like her brother, a mentally handicapped and apish fellow who body slams
anyone that touches his ear.  The beginning sequence when they are both
getting ready to go to the prom is nothing short of unabashed stupidity
that will make you laugh or at least curl your face in shock.  But it's
just an appetizer to get you ready for the really weird stuff that will
follow.
Thirteen years pass since Ted last saw Mary, but he has always carried a
torch for his radiant high-school love.  Taking some advice from his
boss, he hires Pat Healy (Matt Dillon who looks like he was voted "Least
Likely to Trust"), an investigator of sorts, to track down Mary and to
report back on her whereabouts.  Healy is immediately smitten with Mary.
He discourages Ted about pursuing the matter, saying that she's now
overweight and has gone to Japan as a mail-order bride. Healy wants the
babe-alicious Mary to himself and moves down to Miami, uses his array of
listening devices to learn more about her, and tells her what she wants
to hear in order to capture her heart.  Ted, however, follows his heart
and travels down to Miami to find her nonetheless.  The rest of the
movie is a cute love story that focuses on Ted who tries to summon up
enough courage to reintroduce himself into her life.  Healy, however,
looks for ways to neutralize his competition.  And we are introduced to
several other crazy characters who all have their eye on Mary.
Diaz is appealingly charming and Stiller possess good comic timing, but
it is the relentless offering of gross-out humor and inane silliness
that propels this movie.  From the first face-curling moment, your
defense mechanisms quickly jumps into place and you want to decree that
you are above this ludicrous low-brow humor.  "How does a film maker
come up with this kind of material," you wonder.  A lot of the jokes
couldn't work if the camera work and the timing weren't perfect.  But
everything falls funnily into place.   As the pranks and the jokes and
the twisted humor begin to penetrate your defenses, you can't help but
say: "That was gross - hahahaha."  It was vulgar; it was tasteless; and
it was sick.  But I laughed...a lot.

Author
Brian Takeshita
When I saw the trailer for this film, I laughed harder than I had in quite
some time.  While I was therefore pretty well psyched to see it, I was ever
mindful that a trailer can make even the most mediocre film look good.  I'm
happy to say that THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is not one of those trailer
let-downs.  In fact, watching this film was quite a fine way to spend two hours.
The film opens up in flashback to 1985, at a high school in Cumberland,
Rhode Island.  Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) is a social reject who can't
seem to get a date to the upcoming prom, until he comes to the defense of
the mentally retarded Warren (W. Earl Brown), who's being harassed by one of
the school jocks.  It seems Warren's sister is the campus queen, Mary Jensen
(Cameron Diaz), who is impressed with Ted's willingness to stand up for her
defenseless brother, despite a very real chance of getting beaten up.  Mary
takes an immediate liking to Ted and asks him to the prom.  Ted was just
flattered that she even knew his name.  Unfortunately, prom night is ruined
when Ted has an accident with his zipper (at which every man in the theater
will wince), and is sent to the hospital.
Fast forward to the present, where Ted has cleaned himself up, now writes
for a magazine, but has weekly therapy sessions in order to deal with his
obsession of the past 13 years:  Mary, whom he hasn't seen since that
fateful day.  With the help of his friend Dom (Chris Elliott), Ted hires
slimy private investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to track down his only
love.  However, when Pat finds Mary, he falls for her too, and soon the both
of them are competing for her affections.
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is directed by Bobby and Peter Farrelly, who
brought us DUMB AND DUMBER and KINGPIN.  Not exactly intelligent comedies,
they are of the guilty pleasure variety where you might not want your
friends or co-workers to think you had such a great time watching them.
With their current film, the Farrelly brothers have come up with something
you'll not only enjoy, but also won't mind talking about the next day at the
water cooler.
The film succeeds in employing a pretty wide range of comedic styles, from
the subtle to the ridiculous, and while a few of the gags might be offensive
to some (seeming like residuals from the Farrelly brothers' last two films)
they almost all work.  I have not seen many movies in the recent past that
shoot for the mark and so often hit it dead on.  One minute you'll be
laughing at something Ted says, and the next you'll be howling at the sight
of a dog dragging him across the floor of Mary's apartment. 
One of the great things this film has going for it is Ben Stiller.  He is
perfectly cast in the role of Ted, because he's a guy who just looks awkward
in almost every situation.  Ted's a nice fellow and tries to do his best,
but for some reason or another things just don't always work out.  It's
comical, but also has that kind of appeal where you really feel for the him
and want him to come out on top.  Actually, I've liked Stiller since he did
a short which aired on Saturday Night Live back in the mid-eighties.  The
film was like a theatrical trailer for a spoof on the Tom Cruise/Paul Newman
film THE COLOR OF MONEY, entitled THE HUSTLER OF MONEY.  In it, Stiller
played Wince (not Vince) who is taken under the wing of an older man (played
by John Mahoney) to become a big-time bowling hustler.  It was parody at its
finest, more of which showed up in the short-lived "The Ben Stiller Show" on
the Fox network in late '92/early '93.  Like "The Critic" (which aired on
ABC, then Fox), I still mourn that show's cancellation.
Cameron Diaz is absolutely enchanting for most of the film, although her
character seems obsessed with perfection in the men she dates, and some of
the qualities she looks for make Mary look paper-thin at times.  However,
Diaz pulls the role off with such panache and charm, that you can still see
why she's got guys just falling over each other to be with her.  Heck, I
even found her laugh to be cute, even though I thought it was annoying
during an appearance she made on The Tonight Show last week.
My girlfriend remarked that Matt Dillon doesn't change, and you know, it's
really true.  He and Ralph Macchio must hang out or something.  Maybe they
live in Dick Clark's pool house.  Anyway, here's another good piece of
casting, as Dillon slips beautifully into the role of the guy who tries to
worm his way into Mary's heart.
The supporting performances are also good.  Chris Elliott has a bigger part
than in THE ABYSS (yes, check it out next time), and less annoying than in
CABIN BOY.  Lin Shae, who plays Mary's neighbor Magda (and also appeared as
the landlady in KINGPIN), provides some good laughs, especially in scenes
with her Benji-like dog, which acts as the focal point for a few of the
funniest moments of the film.  Lee Evans, as Mary's friend Tucker, displays
a flexibility in acting and accents which surprises and contributes to an
interesting plot twist.
The Farrelly brothers and scriptwriters Ed Decter and John J. Strauss keep
the comedic pacing going so that there aren't any noticeable times where the
film drags.  The only problem I saw was their use of a couple of musicians
who provide segues between several key scenes.  They appear out of nowhere
and actually sing plot-relevant information right toward the camera.  It's a
device which was amusing for about three seconds when they opened the film.
After that it got a little annoying, and it's unfortunate that those spots
interrupt what would otherwise be a smooth flow.  Fortunately, filled with
sight gags, humorous lines, and solid comedic acting, THERE'S SOMETHING
ABOUT MARY will still have you laughing after you leave the theater.

Author
Michael Dequina
There's something about the Farrelly brothers: in this age of political
correctness, the writing/directing duo of Bobby and Peter is not afraid to
throw caution and, above all else, good taste to the wind in pursuit of a
good laugh.  While their go-for-broke style certainly offends as many, if
not more, people than it entertains, anyone who can tap into their truly
sick and twisted wavelength will find a mother lode of laughs in their
latest effort, the often disgusting, constantly shocking, but always
hilarious _There's_Something_About_Mary_.
If the Farrellys pushed the envelope of decency with their previous
lowbrow outings, the PG-13 rated _Dumb_and_Dumber_ and _Kingpin_, then they
tear it to shreds in the R-rated _Mary_.  The film's poster features a
rather innocent, almost ironic-sounding disclaimer ("Warning: the guys who
did _Dumb_and_Dumber_ and _Kingpin_ bring you a love story"), but it is a
warning worth heeding.  Plotwise, _Mary_ does fits the bill of a
traditional romantic comedy.  Thirteen years after graduation, Rhode
Island-based loser Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller), still pines for his
glamorous high school love, Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz), with whom he was
supposed to go to the senior prom; needless to say, things did not quite
work out.  Determined to have another chance at her, Ted hires sleazy
insurance claims investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dillon) to track her down in
her new home city of Miami--and that he does, only to pursue Mary, now an
improbably glam orthopedic surgeon, for himself.
Sounds like typical romantic fluff, but it is far from it.  Remember that
warning?  While the plot covers bases seen in other, tamer romantic
comedies, the brand of humor that is explored along the way is of the
lowest brow.  If the diarrhea and bull semen gags in _Dumb_ and _Kingpin_,
respectively, can be considered "toilet humor," than what the Farrellys
delve into in _Mary_ is the waste product itself; "gross-out" humor seems
too mild a term.  A number of bodily functions (exactly which and how, I
will leave as a surprise) provide the basis of some big laughs, as do gags
involving drugged dogs, gay sex, and, yes, the physically and mentally
challenged.  If this sounds offensive to you, it is.  But its that giddy,
vulgar sense of abandon, doing unspeakable things just extreme enough that
it cannot be taken seriously, that makes the brothers such a unique voice
in comedy.  And one of the most refreshing.
As with all comedies, some gags clank.  A Greek chorus-like singer
(Jonathan Richman), who, along with an accompanying drummer, appears
sporadically to comment on the action, grows old after the first two
"spontaneous" appearances (though he is given a satisfying sendoff); and a
sight gag revolving around Ted's best friend Dom's (Chris Elliott)
sensitive skin condition is not so much funny as just unpleasant to look
at.  But the Farrellys' hit-to-miss ratio is well over .500, rebounding
from duds with some unbelievable showstoppers (such as an outrageous sight
gag that will make all men cringe and cross their legs) and an able cast
that must be commended for, above all else, their incredible bravery to do
some of the things they are called on to do.
It is hard to predict what exactly will be the box office fate of
_There's_Something_About_Mary_; for each person that "gets" the Farrelly
brothers' demented sense of humor, there is sure to be at least two that
are completely, totally disgusted.  But for me and the others on their
warped vibe, _Mary_ is bad, dirty fun.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Ryan Kohler
Movies are made to be fun. . .remember that.  Some movies try to be fun and
still stink (which seems to be the case with "Armageddon", but since I haven't
seen it I won't judge.)  "There's Something About Mary" is the, simply put,
the most fun and funniest movie you are going to see this summer (and,
perhaps, all year.)
A lot has been made about "Mary's" political incorrectness, about its
treatment of retarded people, about its use of bodily fluids.  Does "Mary" go
over the line with some its humor. . . maybe, but, pardon my language, who
gives a shit?  Nothing is sacred to Peter and Bobby Farrelly, the people who
directed (and wrote with Ed Decter and John J. Strauss), and that is one of
the most refreshing things about it.
We see the beginnings of romance in Rhode Island circa 1985 as Ted (Ben
Stiller) lusts after mar (Cameron Diaz).  A tragic (for Ted, at least) prom
night accident ruins things and he spends the next 13 years wondering what
happened to her. Enter Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), a seedy (and I mean SEEDY)
private investigator hired to track Mary down.  When he finds her in Miami he
decides to make HIS move on Mary and Ted is soon in hot in pursuit of both of
them.
All three leads shine.  Diaz isn't just a pretty face, she really shows some
comedic ability.  A lot of comedy comes from Mary's reactions to the people
around her and Diaz is able to make it funny (like the look on her face when
Pat tells her, the sister of a mentally handicapped person, that he likes
"working with retards.")  Dillon, last seen getting in on in "Wild Things", is
surprisingly funny.  I had never been that impressed with his acting before,
but in this setting he was really quite good.  He captured the right amount of
sliminess and buffoonery in his role.  These may seem like simplistic
observations, but, in comedy especially, if an actor doesn't capture the right
mood, things will most definitely NOT be funny, no matter the material (and
vice versa.)  
The best of the lot, though, is Stiller.  His Ted, hurt (in more way than one)
for so many years, is a sad character (there were more than a few "Aws",
including from me, when he got a sad, puppydog look on his face.)  Very rarely
in a comedy, especially one with humor like "Mary"'s, is a character liable to
draw much sympathy.  Because Stiller is one the best all-around comedy talents
in Hollywood, he is able to pull off that unlikely feat.  Credit must also go
to the writers for giving Stiller enough stuff to create someone like Ted.
The Farrelly Brothers obviously know how to direct comedy.  The problem is,
the parts that don't have a lot comedy (there is a LOT of exposition)
sometimes drag. 
For a comedy of this kind, "Mary" is long at 119 minutes, though this is not a
bad thing (except for said slow parts.)  Of the comedic set pieces that are in
this I would not be able to do without any.  In fact, some of these instances,
one in particular, will be talked about for years (including one I'll bet you
don't see coming.)
I hadn't laughed REALLY hard at a movie in quite a while (to be honest, I
can't remember the last belly laugh I had inside a theater).  "Mary" is full
of laughs, of the belly kind and others.  I don't care how hardened you are,
you WILL laugh.  And when was the last time you were guaranteed that?  
Rating (based on a 4.0 cumulative average): 3.75
"There's Something About Mary" (1998).  Directed by Bobby Farrelly and Peter
Farrelly. Written by Ed Decter and John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly and
Bobby Farrelly.  Music by Jonathan Richman.  With Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon,
Ben Stiller, Lee Evans, Chris Elliot, Harland Williams.  Distributed by 20th
Century Fox.  Running time: 119 minutes.  Rated R.
**Visit My Film Review Multiplex: http://pages.prodigy.com/XWKZ01B/index.htm**

Author
Marty Mapes
***1/2 (out of 4) Ben Stiller sure is a good sport. 
His role is downright degrading. He gets caught in his zipper, an episode
that brings him folkloric fame; his (mistaken) arrest for public lewdness is
nationally televised; he masturbates (not on-camera, but for the camera);
and the girl of his dreams endlessly teases him. He is the butt of most of
this movie's outrageous and embarrassing jokes. A lesser, more vain actor
would have turned down the script after reading to page 5, but Stiller stuck
it out. 
Stiller fills the role with the injured dignity of a cat: he can't laugh at
his own comic suffering (his hurt look is priceless), but as long as no harm
is done, he'll get over it. He is the perfect guy to play a joke on, and the
Farrelly brothers heap on the abuse. 
Stiller plays Ted, the hapless high-school geek who was lucky enough to be
asked to the prom by Mary (Cameron Diaz, who herself is the butt of some of
the jokes). The zipper incident ends their date before it can begin, and
before we know it, 13 years have passed. Stiller talks to his old friend Dom
(Chris Elliott, in a role that suits him) and decides that he wants to look
up good old Mary, who has moved to Miami. 
Dom's friend Pat (Matt Dillon, not too bad in one of his first comic roles)
is a private investigator who occasionally makes it down to Florida, so he
agrees to look her up. When he sees Mary he falls for her at first sight, so
hard that he burns his bridges and moves to Florida. Ted hears that Mary is
ugly, fat, and crippled - part of Pat's plan to keep the competition away -
but he still wants to see her after all these years. He too heads to
Florida.... 
THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY is the funniest movie to come along since LIAR
LIAR, but it has a distinct type of humor that's relatively untapped. Jim
Carrey has a lock on one-man sight gags. AIRPLANE!had great verbal gags. HOT
SHOTS!(and others) twist cultural references into humor. But the Farrelly
brothers (and here I also include DUMB & DUMBER and KINGPIN) drill deep into
baser human strata and make jokes that require no command of English, no
understanding of the culture, and no intellect. These jokes are aimed right
at your gut, and good luck telling yourself that you are above all that. 
There are certainly jokes above which I will rise. But these jokes have
extra ammunition. They are never left out on their own, they are always
backed up by auxiliary and followup jokes arising from the same situation.
So while seeing Ted (Stiller) masturbate is something of a joke in itself,
it is by no means the whole joke, and you better watch out when the
reinforcements arrive. 
This movie was very funny, and that is the reason you should go see it. I'm
sure the film had its faults, but I hardly had time to take notice of them.
As for the humor, not all the jokes are as funny as the best ones, and there
are long spells (maybe 20 minutes) between scenes of chaotic hilarity. But
in this film, that really doesn't matter. The good parts make it worth
seeing regardless. 
If you're still not sure whether to see THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, I have
three comments to make: 
 The jokes are cruel. Not sadistic, but cruel. If you can't stand yourself
for laughing at someone else's misfortune, maybe this movie really isn't for
you. 
 The jokes are crude. There aren't too many scatological jokes, but there
are jokes about masturbation, genitalia, and death. If these are offensive
to you, don't go. 
 Go when it's crowded. The audience reaction will make it all the funnier.
If you are the only one in the theater, it just won't be as funny. It
probably won't even be as funny on video (remind me to dock it half a star
when it hits the shelves). 
Other than that, all I can say is go see this film and have a great time. 
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Jason Wallis
"There's Something About Mary" * * * * (out of four) 
Starring Cameron Diaz, Ben Stiller, Matt Dillon, Lee Evans, Chris Elliot,
Lin Shaye, Jeffrey Tambor, Keith David, W. Earl Brown and Brett Favre 
Rated R for extremely crude sexual humor, profanity and fake nudity 
I feel no hesitation in saying that "There's Something About Mary" is the
best film that I will see all year. From the moment the credits started to
roll at the end of the picture, there was no doubt in my mind that I had
seen a masterpiece that will remain unsurpassed in the remaining months of
1998. It is that good of a film. 
When Gene Siskel said this about "Fargo" only a few months into '96, I
dismissed the notion as ridiculous. How could you possibly know that a film
is so great that nothing you could possibly see in the future could beat
it? But after seeing the Farrelly's hilarious and surprisingly heartfelt
masterwork, I now know what Siskel was talking about. Once in a (very
great) while, a film comes along that is so daring, so brilliant and simply
so enjoyable that at the end, you just want to stand up and cheer. And you
know, at that instant, that you have just experienced something very
special. 
Now for the shocker; "Mary" is the grossest and most disgusting film I have
ever viewed ("Pink Flamingos" obviously notwithstanding). The movie is so
rude and, I guess, inappropriate in nature that I had a hard time sitting
in a theater watching it with my parents (luckily I had seen it before
them, so I could warn the about what they were in for). Forget "Blazing
Saddles", "Animal House" and even the former king of gross-out comedy,
"Monty Python's Meaning of Life"; they were all only preludes to the
Farrelly's assault on the senses. 
In fact, this may even be the funniest film I've ever had the pleasure of
seeing (the only real contender is "Monty Python and the Holy Grail"), and
most certainly the most hilarious to come out all decade. 
But as funny as it is, something also has to be said about the overall
sweetness of "Mary"; it has a huge heart. You see, the Farrelly's are truly
gifted filmmakers. They don't just present you with a string of dick and
fart jokes (although there are plenty to go around). They also, very
wisely, add an unbelievable amount of charisma to the main characters and
actually have them develop as the story progresses. 
It's funny, though. If you just look at an outline of the story, it seems
kind of contrived and predictable. But believe me, it is anything but. Ben
Stiller plays Ted, a very shy and clumsy teenage geek who lusts after the
school babe, Mary (Cameron Diaz). After he sticks up for her retarded
brother, Warren (W. Early Brown - the cameraman, believe it or not, from
"Scream"), his dreams come true when she invites him to the prom. In one of
the film's funniest scenes, something goes wrong (I won't ruin it for those
who know nothing about the film) and Ted is unable to face Mary ever again.
Jump to the present. After years of self-loathing, Ted finally hires
private detective Pat Healy (a suitably slimy Matt Dillon) to track her
down so he can have one last chance at winning the woman he has loved since
high school. Healy finds that Mary is still a full-blown hottie and decides
to try and keep her for himself. 
Admittingly, the basic story line leaves a little to be desired. After all,
with a not-really-all-that-funny premise, how can you sustain laughter for
nearly two hours? Somehow, the Farrelly's pull it off. 
The performances here are also right on target. As Ted, Stiller adds just
the right amount of clumsy charm to make his character not irritating, as
he would normally be, but very lovable. And Cameron Diaz is perfect in her
role for obvious reasons, but the actor who really grabs your attention is
W. Earl Brown as Mary's brother. No other actor has even come close to
playing a mentally retarded man with as much natural ease as Brown displays
here. I know he won't be nominated, but this is the guy who should not be
counted out when it comes time to hand out the Oscar nods in February. As
good as the actors are, though, it's the directors' movie all the way. 
I guarantee that on almost every other top ten list at the end of the year,
you will see the number one space occupied by Steven Spielberg's WWII epic
"Saving Private Ryan". And yes, that is a great film worthy of the
recognition it has been getting. But which is harder; making a great war
film or having your audience laugh so hard that they can't breath for
minutes at a time? I'll let you decide that one for yourself, but this
critic is sticking to his guns. There is just something about "Mary". 
*Find all of Jason's reviews at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Michael Redman
        Every once in a while you meet a member of the opposite sex with whom you
establish an instant fascination. Who know why it happens? Cosmic fate?
Soulmates? Pheromones? Recognition of a potential dysfunctional relationship?
Whatever it is, one look and you're lost in their eyes, ready to follow to the
ends of the Earth and make remarkably stupid choices in the name of love.
        And whatever it is, Mary has it in abundance. The guys are lined up down the
block just for a chance to be with her. The trouble is that they're mostly
sleazy lying lowlifes. None of them are who they pretend to be.
        In 1985 high school loser Ted Stroehmann (Ben Stiller) finally hits it lucky.
Mary Jenson (Cameron Diaz), the local teen beauty, has asked him to the Senior
Prom after he stuck up for her mentally challenged brother Warren (W. Earl
Brown). True to form, Ted's fortune reverts to usual on prom night.
        Making a pit stop in Mary's bathroom, Ted has an unfortunate accident. In a
scene guaranteed to make every man in the audience cringe, he catches a
sensitive part of his anatomy in his zipper. Mary's father comes in to help
him and is so astonished at the severity of the situation that he invites her
mother in for a peek. In Marx Brothers style, a policeman crawls in through
the window and a fireman joins the party. The last that Ted sees Mary is as
he's being dropped by the paramedics on the way to the hospital.
        Seventeen years later, Ted is still bewitched and hires Pat Healy (Matt
Dillon), a would-be detective to track down the object of his desire. When Pat
locates her in Florida he falls for her and lies to Ted about her condition.
According to him, she's put on some tonnage, is the wheelchair-bound unwed
mother of four by three different men and is on her way to Japan as a
mail-order bride. In real life, she's one hot babe.
        When Ted learns the truth, he's in the sunshine state to discover Pat
romancing Mary. The private eye has been spying on her to discover her image
of the perfect man and attempts to present himself as that being. He's not
doing such a great job. She is intrigued by Nepal so he tells her that he owns
a condo in Nepal. She is concerned for the less fortunate (her best friend
walks with braces, she feeds an old homeless man and spends time with her
brother and his friends) and he explains that his greatest joy in life is
working with "retards". Naive Mary believes it all - a _condo_ in Nepal?
        Ted tries to win Mary. Pat tries to win Mary. Every other guy in the film
tries to win Mary.
        What is it about her? Obviously one of the "something"s is Mary's habit of
wearing thin clingy clothing while forgetting her underwear. If anyone's gaze
happens to make it up to her face, there's a winning smile and liquid eyes. On
a less physical level, she's charming, giggly, kind-hearted and full of life.
No wonder every male is falling all over himself.
        This pretty much describes an intriguing but fairly traditional romantic
comedy. What sets this film off from the others is that it is directed by
Peter and Bobby Farrelly. Responsible for the tasteless (and even worse,
unfunny) "Dumb And Dumber", they bring their distinctive style to the genre.
        The film is filled with low-grade vulgar bathroom humor. No group escapes the
opportunity to be the butt of jokes. Gays, the physically and mentally
challenged, dogs, Blacks, old women: they all get their chance.
        The astonishing thing is that, if you can leave political-correctness at the
door, it's are often hilarious. The Farrelly brothers are not content to show
us a bit and allow us to laugh at it. They go on and on with it until it's
crammed down our throats. Pat accidentally kills a small dog, attempts to
revive it, and the scene is, to put it mildly, stupid. But as it continues far
past a reasonable amount of time, you'll be rolling in the aisles embarrassed
that you find it laughable.
        When Ted is "cleaning his pipes" before a date with Mary, the incident is
crude, offensive and uncomfortable. Despite the audience's best intention, it
also gets the biggest laugh of the picture, destined to be talked about for
months and possibly inspire new hairstyles.
        For every vulgar scene that works, there's one that definitely doesn't. When
Mary's braced friend Tucker (Lee Evans) drops his keys and attempts to pick
them up for seemingly hours, it's cruel and not humorous. And then they do it
again. 
        Ted gets a fishhook caught in his mouth and it's just a waste of footage. The
30 year-olds as high school students are a groan. Ted's friend Dom (Chris
Elliott) develops a face covered with boils. That's supposed to be humorous.
It's not.
        The film would be a disaster without such a stellar cast. Stiller has a
talent for comedy as evidenced by his 1994 Emmy for writing Fox's "Ben Stiller
Show". Dillon, playing against type, does well as the trashy Pat. His
pencil-thin mustache is a riot. Elliott is always comical and gets a chance to
strut his stuff. Even the smaller part of Mary's leather-skinned neighbor
Magda (Lin Shaye) is well-casted.
        Singer Jonathon Richman walks out of the scenery occasionally as a Greek
chorus with songs commenting on the current status of the plot.
        Brown as Mary's brother is a stitch. He is the star of every scene that he's
in. Fortunately most of the humor surrounding his disability involves laughing
with him rather than at him.
        Then there's Cameron Diaz. The film's title is right: there's something about
Cameron. With her allure and fresh style, she's headed for the big time.
        The film is not for everyone. It requires abandoning all sense of decorum. If
you have an inner 14-year old boy, you will find parts of it great fun. If you
don't, stay home and watch that documentary on the migratory habits of some songbird.
(Michael Redman has written this column for over 23 years and admits that his
inner child hasn't quite made it to 14 yet. Email tasteless stories to redman@bvoice.com)
[This appeared in the 7/23/98 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be contacted at redman@bvoice.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
Chad Polenz
1998, R, 118 minutes [1 hour, 58 minutes]
starring: Ben Stiller (Ted Stroehem), Cameron Diaz (Mary Jensen-Matthews),
 Matt Dillon (Pat Healy), Lee Evans (Tucker); written by Ed Decter, John J.
 Strauss, Peter Farrelly, Bobby Farrelly; Michael Steinberg, Bradley
 Thomas, Charles B. Wessler, Frank Beddor; directed by Peter and Bobby
 Farrelly.
Seen July 25, 1998 at 2 p.m. at Rotterdam Square Cinemas, theater #1, with
 Chris Wessell for free using my Loews/Sony critic's pass. [Theater rating:
 ***: good picture, sound, and seats]
If there's any genre that could use improvement, the lowbrow screwball comedy
 is it. One does not tend to associate such films with authentic romance,
 intricate plotting, and witty scripting, which are all qualities possessed by
 "There's Something About Mary" that make it a cut above the rest. There's an
 over-all sense of moderation here to make the jokes all the more funnier,
 especially considering how questionable the level of taste is.
The film starts out with a flashback to the mid 1980s, in the suburbs of
 Rhode Island where all comedies involving high school flashbacks might take
 place. The teens all appear to be in their 20s, but it keeps with the
 nostalgic, satirical atmosphere. We're quickly introduced to our main
 characters, Ted (Stiller), a dorky loser who inadvertantly charms the new foxy
 girl Mary (Diaz), after standing up for her retarded brother in a scene so
 generic it's original in its unapologetic approach.
Initially, the film is a little slow to demonstrate its comedic power. The
 atmosphere is rather sitcom-esque, but once the first bout of zaniness is
 unleashed, it's clear this is not going to be zinger-oriented comedy.
The promotions hint at the first major joke and plot device, which involves
 Ted having a painful accident with his zipper. To elaborate on the set-up of
 this joke would be an injustice to the film, but the way this gag is set up
 and the ultimate, hilarious delivery it provides goes to show how such a crude
 joke can be stretched out without snapping. 
Ted's injury itself is funny, but the way the other characters react to it is
 the key. Penis jokes are pretty much the lowest of the lowbrow, but the film
 works in such a way as to let the viewer decide how gross the gag is (although
 it's still funny no matter how you see it).
Eventually a plot unfolds involving Ted's modern-day search for Mary. Through
 a series of connections he is put in touch with Pat Healy (Dillon), a slow-
 witted creepy character who fits in perfectly in such a screwball comedy.
 Healy tracks down Mary, who is now an orthopedic surgeon living in Florida,
 still foxy as ever, and still yearning for true love. It's no surprise Healy
 is attracted to her and proceeds to lie to Ted to discourage him from pursuing
 her. Using a bag of tricks James Bond might have thrown away, Healy learns
 everything about Mary. The conversations he is allowed to hear might seem a
 little too convenient to the plot, but the set-ups are funny and interesting
 enough to make them pay off. As Healy spies on Mary, we too feel the sense of
 voyeurism, which of course makes for many jokes and gags, but is something a
 film like this wouldn't usually inspire.
And it is this kind of surprising, subtle charm that gives the film merit.
 It's not meant to be any kind of achievement in film making, but just a good
 comedy which is becoming increasingly difficult to do. It takes the time to
 sketch out the characters - to provide motivation, backstory, and thematic
 elements. None of this is really necessary, as the film could have easily been
 more concentrated on the gags, but the fact it's here at all shows a level of
 maturity. Maturity in the midst of jokes involving slapstick, bodily functions
 and fluids, stupidity, and gross sight gags, but maturity nevertheless.
The entire middle hour can be used to illustrate this concept, as it's not
 just a series of jokes to string together a plot, but a story that constantly
 unfolds new layers without becoming confusing or predictable. New characters
 and minor sub-plots are introduced into the fray as natural transitions of the
 story. For example, another possible suitor for Mary named Tucker (Evans), is
 casually introduced as a supporting character. Gradually we learn he is not
 what he seems, as he too has been victimized by Mary's charm and beauty and
 will stop at nothing to gain the same affection both Ted and Pat Healy are
 striving for. More background material is lain out to give the plot some
 semblance of complexity. The gags and one-liners are plugged in at all the
 right points, but they all push the story just that much further. 
Of course the film does get a little sidetracked for the really bizarre
 elements of the comedy. The Farrelly brothers have been known to push the
 envelope, but where as most do so for pure shock value, theirs seem to be
 natural progressions of the story. Somehow an elaborate gag involving
 masturbation provides for the slightest, idiosyncratic insight to the male
 mind. The same can be said for conversations about meat products on sticks and
 cones, or why movies like "Harold And Maude" aren't made anymore. Taken out of
 context this type of comedy might seem typical, but inside the film they work
 well.
Wrapping up zany comedies such as this usually involve a lot of cop-outs,
 sudden revelations, wild action, and predictable endings, and although some of
 these things are present here, the process of putting them together continues
 to highlight the film's subtle hook. As is most of the film, it's generic and
 off-the-wall, and yet funny and charming.
My only major grievance with "There's Something About Mary" might be the fact
 it's not as funny as it could have been, but that's because there's a sense of
 continuity and thoroughness here - something a lot of other movies could take
 a cue from.


Author
Luke Buckmaster
REVIEW: There's Something About Mary
By Luke Buckmaster (bucky@alphalink.com.au)
Cast: Ben Stiller, Cameron Diaz, Matt Dillon, Chris Elliott, Lin Shaye,
Lee Evans, W. Earl Brown
Directors: Peter Farrelly & Bobby Farrelly
Screenplay: Ed Decter & John J. Strauss and Peter Farrelly & Bobby
Farrelly
Australian release date:  September 3 1998
Hysterically funny, brilliantly crafted and un-apologetically repulsive.
Just in case you want me to go on, allow me to announce that There's
Something About Mary is one of the funniest comedies so far this decade.
The Farley brothers, responsible for Dumb and Dumber and Kingpins, bring
forth their wicked visions to the screen with absolutely no subtlety:
the film makes fun of the mentally handicapped, gays, blow jobs,
masturbation, murder, drugs, elderly people, head jobs, architects, the
physically handicapped, masculinityget the drift?
There's not only something about Mary (Cameron Diaz), there's everything
about her - she's good looking, loves beer, sports and helping the
community.  That's why Ted (Ben Stiller) hires shady insurance claims
investigator Pat Healy (Matt Dhillon) to track her down after not seeing
her since prom night, thirteen years ago (when he managed to get his
family jewels stuck in his zipper).  But Pat begins to fall for Mary,
Ted begins to long for Mary and a collection of other sitcom-like
characters all want to be with her.
The good news is that the Farleys have taken all of societies most
sensitive themes and meshed them into one despicable, unrelenting comedy
that had me almost choking on my own laughter.  To subside for the fact
that the film is basically plotless, every ounce of its boisterously
entertaining story is milked for the gags, and there are five or six key
comedy sequences.   All of the cast shine in their undemanding roles,
with Ben Stiller looking especially good as both a teenage loser and an
adultloser.  Cameron Diaz is also splendid; she's a talented actor who
looks gorgeous on the screen, and is able to give a reasonably refined
performance in an incredibly unrefined film.
After a long, long time without any really funny comedies (As Good as it
Gets came close, tough) it's so refreshing to see something so
ridiculously amusing, so ashamedly enjoyable.  It's up there with The
Birdcage and Nothing to Lose for the best comedies of the 90's and it
is, undoubtedly, hysterically funny, brilliantly crafted and
un-apologetically repulsive.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com.au for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Movie Zone: http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Walter Frith
'There's Something About Mary' (1998)
Member of the 'Internet Movie Critics Association'
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Studio/5713/index.html
Member of the 'Online Film Critics Society'
http://smart.sbay.com/ofcs/
Say hello to Ted.  He's a nerdy little yet well meaning guy who is about
to go to his high school prom in Rhode Island in 1985.  Never dreaming
he'd get a decent date for the occasion, Ted (Ben Stiller) is
overwhelmed when beautiful Mary (Cameron Diaz) asks HIM to go to the
prom with her.  Mary is the object of every guy's desire with her
beautiful long hair, sparkling eyes and cheery smile and Ted, complete
with braces, uncropped and mop like hair, still can't believe she wants
to go with him.  Upon picking Mary up for the dance, Ted uses the little
general's room and upon "zipping it up too fast", he has an accident
with his anatomy and can't go on his dream date.  This prolonged scene,
which is an exercise in extreme bad taste (but you'll love it), has
everyone looking on, based on their own bizarre curiosity.  Mary's mom,
step dad, a police officer, a fireman and Mary herself.  Poor Ted.  He's
not a loser, just a guy who runs into some bad luck.
Fast forward thirteen years to the present day.  We discover that Ted,
still living in Rhode Island, is still on the road to nowhere and has
periodic conversations with his friend Dom (Chris Elliott) about life in
general and after all these years, Ted still can't forget about Mary and
hires a shady private investigator named Pat Healy (Matt Dillon), to
look her up and report back to him.  Upon finding Mary living in Miami,
Healy begins falling for Mary himself and reports back to Ted that she's
fat, has four kids by three different men and is confined to a wheel
chair.  This doesn't detract Ted from finding Mary.  Mary, we discover,
as Ted does eventually, is actually a successful orthopedic surgeon,
with lots of friends who brings companionship and conversation to her
lonely and pathetically youth obsessed elderly neighbour named Magda
(Lin Shaye).
The Farrelly brothers, Bobby and Peter, whose previous film credits
include 'Dumb and Dumber' and 'Kingpin', strive to push the envelope
towards extremely crude humour and this time they miss the mark for
several reasons while still making a reasonably good film in many
resepects.  First of all, the film has long stretches where nothing
really funny happens and there are two scenes in particular that
actually drove me to almost vomit.  Many patrons of the performance I
attended were shocked as many of them were heard screaming instead of
laughing in many of the film's scenes of gross out humour.
I love politically incorrect humour.  One of the problems with political
correctness is that is robs people of being themselves and at the same
time it gets them labeled by supporters of the movement  who become
hypocrites themselves by knocking people who refuse to follow the rules
of p.c.  But even my love for politically incorrect humour can be
stretched too far as it is in this film.
'Dumb and Dumber' and 'Kingpin' had some really funny moments without
repelling movie goers.  Not so with 'There's Something About Mary'.  The
film actually repels and tries to hard to be funny and Ben Stiller is
rather flat and unfunny and isn't really suited for the part as well as
some other more colourful actors could have been.  Cameron Diaz and Matt
Dillion aren't funny either and that brings further hindrance to the
film.  If sight gags and repellent humour can be perceived as funny
without much input from the cast, the camera gets most of the credit
that really ISN'T funny.  In fairness, there some really funny moments
in this film but they are overshadowed by the ones that cross the line.
Jokes about mental retardation, crippled people, sperm and cruelty to
animals will appeal to some and the belly laughs could have been there
with less effort and more concentration on making it look easy rather
than by using a polo mallet on our private parts.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/movies.htm
Walter Frith's Top 100 Movies of All Time Are Now Online At:
http://home.netinc.ca/~wfrith/wftop100.htm
